Florida, session 2026, SB250.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 516 517 Section 1.âParagraph (a) of subsection (3) and paragraph 518 (c) of subsection (10) of section 20.60, Florida Statutes, are 519 amended, and paragraph (a) of subsection (5) of that section is 520 reenacted, to read: 521 20.60âDepartment of Commerce; creation; powers and duties.â 522 (3)(a)âThe following divisions and offices of the 523 Department of Commerce are established: 524 1.âThe Division of Economic Development. 525 2.âThe Division of Community Development. 526 3.âThe Division of Workforce Services. 527 4.âThe Division of Finance and Administration. 528 5.âThe Division of Information Technology. 529 6.âThe Office of the Secretary. 530 7.âThe Office of Rural Prosperity. 531 8.âThe Office of Economic Accountability and Transparency, 532 which shall: 533 a.âOversee the departmentâs critical objectives as 534 determined by the secretary and make sure that the departmentâs 535 key objectives are clearly communicated to the public. 536 b.âOrganize department resources, expertise, data, and 537 research to focus on and solve the complex economic challenges 538 facing the state. 539 c.âProvide leadership for the departmentâs priority issues 540 that require integration of policy, management, and critical 541 objectives from multiple programs and organizations internal and 542 external to the department; and organize and manage external 543 communication on such priority issues. 544 d.âPromote and facilitate key department initiatives to 545 address priority economic issues and explore data and identify 546 opportunities for innovative approaches to address such economic 547 issues. 548 e.âPromote strategic planning for the department. 549 (5)âThe divisions within the department have specific 550 responsibilities to achieve the duties, responsibilities, and 551 goals of the department. Specifically: 552 (a)âThe Division of Economic Development shall: 553 1.âAnalyze and evaluate business prospects identified by 554 the Governor and the secretary. 555 2.âAdminister certain tax refund, tax credit, and grant 556 programs created in law. Notwithstanding any other provision of 557 law, the department may expend interest earned from the 558 investment of program funds deposited in the Grants and 559 Donations Trust Fund to contract for the administration of those 560 programs, or portions of the programs, assigned to the 561 department by law, by the appropriations process, or by the 562 Governor. Such expenditures shall be subject to review under 563 chapter 216. 564 3.âDevelop measurement protocols for the state incentive 565 programs and for the contracted entities which will be used to 566 determine their performance and competitive value to the state. 567 Performance measures, benchmarks, and sanctions must be 568 developed in consultation with the legislative appropriations 569 committees and the appropriate substantive committees, and are 570 subject to the review and approval process provided in s. 571 216.177. The approved performance measures, standards, and 572 sanctions shall be included and made a part of the strategic 573 plan for contracts entered into for delivery of programs 574 authorized by this section. 575 4.âDevelop a 5-year statewide strategic plan. The strategic 576 plan must include, but need not be limited to: 577 a.âStrategies for the promotion of business formation, 578 expansion, recruitment, and retention through aggressive 579 marketing, attraction of venture capital and finance 580 development, domestic trade, international development, and 581 export assistance, which lead to more and better jobs and higher 582 wages for all geographic regions, disadvantaged communities, and 583 populations of the state, including rural areas, minority 584 businesses, and urban core areas. 585 b.âThe development of realistic policies and programs to 586 further the economic diversity of the state, its regions, and 587 their associated industrial clusters. 588 c.âSpecific provisions for the stimulation of economic 589 development and job creation in rural areas and midsize cities 590 and counties of the state, including strategies for rural 591 marketing and the development of infrastructure in rural areas. 592 d.âProvisions for the promotion of the successful long-term 593 economic development of the state with increased emphasis in 594 market research and information. 595 e.âPlans for the generation of foreign investment in the 596 state which create jobs paying above-average wages and which 597 result in reverse investment in the state, including programs 598 that establish viable overseas markets, assist in meeting the 599 financing requirements of export-ready firms, broaden 600 opportunities for international joint venture relationships, use 601 the resources of academic and other institutions, coordinate 602 trade assistance and facilitation services, and facilitate 603 availability of and access to education and training programs 604 that assure requisite skills and competencies necessary to 605 compete successfully in the global marketplace. 606 f.âThe identification of business sectors that are of 607 current or future importance to the stateâs economy and to the 608 stateâs global business image, and development of specific 609 strategies to promote the development of such sectors. 610 g.âStrategies for talent development necessary in the state 611 to encourage economic development growth, taking into account 612 factors such as the stateâs talent supply chain, education and 613 training opportunities, and available workforce. 614 h.âStrategies and plans to support this stateâs defense, 615 space, and aerospace industries and the emerging complementary 616 business activities and industries that support the development 617 and growth of defense, space, and aerospace in this state. 618 5.âUpdate the strategic plan every 5 years. 619 6.âInvolve CareerSource Florida, Inc.; direct-support 620 organizations of the department; local governments; the general 621 public; local and regional economic development organizations; 622 other local, state, and federal economic, international, and 623 workforce development entities; the business community; and 624 educational institutions to assist with the strategic plan. 625 7.âCoordinate with the Florida Tourism Industry Marketing 626 Corporation in the development of the 4-year marketing plan 627 pursuant to s. 288.1226(13). 628 8.âAdminister and manage relationships, as appropriate, 629 with the entities and programs created pursuant to the Florida 630 Capital Formation Act, ss. 288.9621-288.96255. 631 (10)âThe department shall, by November 1 of each year, 632 submit an annual report to the Governor, the President of the 633 Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives on the 634 condition of the business climate and economic development in 635 the state. 636 (c)âThe report must incorporate annual reports of other 637 programs, including: 638 1.âA detailed report of the performance of the Black 639 Business Loan Program and a cumulative summary of quarterly 640 report data required under s. 288.714. 641 2.âThe Rural Economic Development Initiative established 642 under s. 288.0656. 643 3.âA detailed report of the performance of the Florida 644 Development Finance Corporation and a summary of the 645 corporationâs report required under s. 288.9610. 646 3.4.âInformation provided by Space Florida under s. 647 331.3051 and an analysis of the activities and accomplishments 648 of Space Florida. 649 Section 2.âSubsection (5) is added to section 163.3168, 650 Florida Statutes, to read: 651 163.3168âPlanning innovations and technical assistance.â 652 (5)âWhen selecting applications for funding for technical 653 assistance, the state land planning agency shall give preference 654 to local governments located in a rural area of opportunity as 655 defined in s. 288.0656. The state land planning agency shall 656 consult with the Office of Rural Prosperity when awarding 657 funding pursuant to this section. 658 Section 3.âParagraph (i) is added to subsection (4) of 659 section 201.15, Florida Statutes, to read: 660 201.15âDistribution of taxes collected.âAll taxes collected 661 under this chapter are hereby pledged and shall be first made 662 available to make payments when due on bonds issued pursuant to 663 s. 215.618 or s. 215.619, or any other bonds authorized to be 664 issued on a parity basis with such bonds. Such pledge and 665 availability for the payment of these bonds shall have priority 666 over any requirement for the payment of service charges or costs 667 of collection and enforcement under this section. All taxes 668 collected under this chapter, except taxes distributed to the 669 Land Acquisition Trust Fund pursuant to subsections (1) and (2), 670 are subject to the service charge imposed in s. 215.20(1). 671 Before distribution pursuant to this section, the Department of 672 Revenue shall deduct amounts necessary to pay the costs of the 673 collection and enforcement of the tax levied by this chapter. 674 The costs and service charge may not be levied against any 675 portion of taxes pledged to debt service on bonds to the extent 676 that the costs and service charge are required to pay any 677 amounts relating to the bonds. All of the costs of the 678 collection and enforcement of the tax levied by this chapter and 679 service charge shall be available and transferred to the extent 680 necessary to pay debt service and any other amounts payable with 681 respect to bonds authorized before January 1, 2017, secured by 682 revenues distributed pursuant to this section. All taxes 683 remaining after deduction of costs shall be distributed as 684 follows: 685 (4)âAfter the required distributions to the Land 686 Acquisition Trust Fund pursuant to subsections (1) and (2) and 687 deduction of the service charge imposed pursuant to s. 688 215.20(1), the remainder shall be distributed as follows: 689 (i)âA total of $30 million shall be paid to the credit of 690 the State Transportation Trust Fund, which funds are exclusively 691 for the use of the Florida Arterial Road Modernization Program 692 as provided in s. 339.68. 693 Section 4.âParagraph (c) of subsection (2) of section 694 202.18, Florida Statutes, is amended, and paragraph (b) of 695 subsection (2) of that section is republished, to read: 696 202.18âAllocation and disposition of tax proceeds.âThe 697 proceeds of the communications services taxes remitted under 698 this chapter shall be treated as follows: 699 (2)âThe proceeds of the taxes remitted under s. 700 202.12(1)(b) shall be allocated as follows: 701 (b)âFifty-five and nine-tenths percent of the remainder 702 shall be allocated to the state and distributed pursuant to s. 703 212.20(6), except that the proceeds allocated pursuant to s. 704 212.20(6)(d)2.b. shall be prorated to the participating counties 705 in the same proportion as that monthâs collection of the taxes 706 and fees imposed pursuant to chapter 212 and paragraph (1)(b). 707 (c)1.âAfter the distribution required under paragraph (b), 708 the remainder During each calendar year, the remaining portion 709 of the proceeds shall be transferred to the Local Government 710 Half-cent Sales Tax Clearing Trust Fund and. Seventy percent of 711 such proceeds shall be allocated in the same proportion as the 712 allocation of total receipts of the half-cent sales tax under s. 713 218.61 and the emergency distribution under s. 218.65 in the 714 prior state fiscal year. Thirty percent of such proceeds shall 715 be distributed pursuant to s. 218.67. 716 2.âThe proportion of the proceeds allocated based on the 717 emergency distribution under s. 218.65 shall be distributed 718 pursuant to s. 218.65. 719 3.âIn each calendar year, the proportion of the proceeds 720 allocated based on the half-cent sales tax under s. 218.61 shall 721 be allocated to each county in the same proportion as the 722 countyâs percentage of total sales tax allocation for the prior 723 state fiscal year and distributed pursuant to s. 218.62. 724 4.âThe department shall distribute the appropriate amount 725 to each municipality and county each month at the same time that 726 local communications services taxes are distributed pursuant to 727 subsection (3). 728 Section 5.âParagraph (d) of subsection (6) of section 729 212.20, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 730 212.20âFunds collected, disposition; additional powers of 731 department; operational expense; refund of taxes adjudicated 732 unconstitutionally collected.â 733 (6)âDistribution of all proceeds under this chapter and ss. 734 202.18(1)(b) and (2)(b) and 203.01(1)(a)3. is as follows: 735 (d)âThe proceeds of all other taxes and fees imposed 736 pursuant to this chapter or remitted pursuant to s. 202.18(1)(b) 737 and (2)(b) shall be distributed as follows: 738 1.âIn any fiscal year, the greater of $500 million, minus 739 an amount equal to 4.6 percent of the proceeds of the taxes 740 collected pursuant to chapter 201, or 5.2 percent of all other 741 taxes and fees imposed pursuant to this chapter or remitted 742 pursuant to s. 202.18(1)(b) and (2)(b) shall be deposited in 743 monthly installments into the General Revenue Fund. 744 2.âAfter the distribution under subparagraph 1., 8.9744 745 percent of the amount remitted by a sales tax dealer located 746 within a participating county pursuant to s. 218.61 shall be 747 transferred in two parts: 748 a.âThe total amount of $50 million of the communications 749 services taxes remitted pursuant to s. 202.18(1)(b) and (2)(b), 750 in any fiscal year, shall be distributed by the department by a 751 nonoperating transfer to the Department of Commerce in monthly 752 installments to the Grants and Donations Trust Fund within the 753 Department of Commerce for the Utility Relocation Reimbursement 754 Grant Program created in s. 337.4031; and 755 b.âThe remainder shall be transferred into the Local 756 Government Half-cent Sales Tax Clearing Trust Fund. Beginning 757 October 1, 2025, the amount to be transferred shall be reduced 758 by 0.1018 percent, and the department shall distribute this 759 amount to the Public Employees Relations Commission Trust Fund 760 less $5,000 each month, which shall be added to the amount 761 calculated in subparagraph 3. and distributed accordingly. 762 3.âAfter the distribution under subparagraphs 1. and 2., 763 0.0966 percent shall be transferred to the Local Government 764 Half-cent Sales Tax Clearing Trust Fund and distributed pursuant 765 to s. 218.65. 766 4.âAfter the distributions under subparagraphs 1., 2., and 767 3., 2.0810 percent of the available proceeds shall be 768 transferred monthly to the Revenue Sharing Trust Fund for 769 Counties pursuant to s. 218.215. 770 5.âAfter the distributions under subparagraphs 1., 2., and 771 3., 1.3653 percent of the available proceeds shall be 772 transferred monthly to the Revenue Sharing Trust Fund for 773 Municipalities pursuant to s. 218.215. If the total revenue to 774 be distributed pursuant to this subparagraph is at least as 775 great as the amount due from the Revenue Sharing Trust Fund for 776 Municipalities and the former Municipal Financial Assistance 777 Trust Fund in state fiscal year 1999-2000, no municipality shall 778 receive less than the amount due from the Revenue Sharing Trust 779 Fund for Municipalities and the former Municipal Financial 780 Assistance Trust Fund in state fiscal year 1999-2000. If the 781 total proceeds to be distributed are less than the amount 782 received in combination from the Revenue Sharing Trust Fund for 783 Municipalities and the former Municipal Financial Assistance 784 Trust Fund in state fiscal year 1999-2000, each municipality 785 shall receive an amount proportionate to the amount it was due 786 in state fiscal year 1999-2000. 787 6.âAfter the distributions required under subparagraphs 1. 788 5., the greater of $50 million or 0.1412 percent of the 789 available proceeds shall be transferred in each fiscal year to 790 fiscally constrained counties pursuant to s. 218.67. 791 7.âOf the remaining proceeds: 792 a.âIn each fiscal year, the sum of $29,915,500 shall be 793 divided into as many equal parts as there are counties in the 794 state, and one part shall be distributed to each county. The 795 distribution among the several counties must begin each fiscal 796 year on or before January 5th and continue monthly for a total 797 of 4 months. If a local or special law required that any moneys 798 accruing to a county in fiscal year 1999-2000 under the then 799 existing provisions of s. 550.135 be paid directly to the 800 district school board, special district, or a municipal 801 government, such payment must continue until the local or 802 special law is amended or repealed. The state covenants with 803 holders of bonds or other instruments of indebtedness issued by 804 local governments, special districts, or district school boards 805 before July 1, 2000, that it is not the intent of this 806 subparagraph to adversely affect the rights of those holders or 807 relieve local governments, special districts, or district school 808 boards of the duty to meet their obligations as a result of 809 previous pledges or assignments or trusts entered into which 810 obligated funds received from the distribution to county 811 governments under then-existing s. 550.135. This distribution 812 specifically is in lieu of funds distributed under s. 550.135 813 before July 1, 2000. 814 b.âThe department shall distribute $166,667 monthly to each 815 applicant certified as a facility for a new or retained 816 professional sports franchise pursuant to s. 288.1162. Up to 817 $41,667 shall be distributed monthly by the department to each 818 certified applicant as defined in s. 288.11621 for a facility 819 for a spring training franchise. However, not more than $416,670 820 may be distributed monthly in the aggregate to all certified 821 applicants for facilities for spring training franchises. 822 Distributions begin 60 days after such certification and 823 continue for not more than 30 years, except as otherwise 824 provided in s. 288.11621. A certified applicant identified in 825 this sub-subparagraph may not receive more in distributions than 826 expended by the applicant for the public purposes provided in s. 827 288.1162(5) or s. 288.11621(3). 828 c.âThe department shall distribute up to $83,333 monthly to 829 each certified applicant as defined in s. 288.11631 for a 830 facility used by a single spring training franchise, or up to 831 $166,667 monthly to each certified applicant as defined in s. 832 288.11631 for a facility used by more than one spring training 833 franchise. Monthly distributions begin 60 days after such 834 certification or July 1, 2016, whichever is later, and continue 835 for not more than 20 years to each certified applicant as 836 defined in s. 288.11631 for a facility used by a single spring 837 training franchise or not more than 25 years to each certified 838 applicant as defined in s. 288.11631 for a facility used by more 839 than one spring training franchise. A certified applicant 840 identified in this sub-subparagraph may not receive more in 841 distributions than expended by the applicant for the public 842 purposes provided in s. 288.11631(3). 843 d.âThe department shall distribute $15,333 monthly to the 844 State Transportation Trust Fund. 845 e.âBeginning July 1, 2023, in each fiscal year, the 846 department shall distribute $27.5 million to the Florida 847 Agricultural Promotional Campaign Trust Fund under s. 571.26, 848 for further distribution in accordance with s. 571.265. 849 8.7.âAll other proceeds must remain in the General Revenue 850 Fund. 851 Section 6.âParagraph (h) of subsection (1) of section 852 215.971, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 853 215.971âAgreements funded with federal or state 854 assistance.â 855 (1)âAn agency agreement that provides state financial 856 assistance to a recipient or subrecipient, as those terms are 857 defined in s. 215.97, or that provides federal financial 858 assistance to a subrecipient, as defined by applicable United 859 States Office of Management and Budget circulars, must include 860 all of the following: 861 (h)1.âIf the agency agreement provides federal or state 862 financial assistance to a county or municipality that is a rural 863 community or rural area of opportunity as those terms are 864 defined in s. 288.0656(2), a provision allowing the agency to 865 provide for the payment of invoices to the county, municipality, 866 or rural area of opportunity as that term is defined in s. 867 288.0656(2), for verified and eligible performance that has been 868 completed in accordance with the terms and conditions set forth 869 in the agreement. This provision is not intended to require 870 reimbursement to the county, municipality, or rural area of 871 opportunity for invoices paid, but to allow the agency to 872 provide for the payment of invoices due. The agency shall 873 expedite such payment requests in order to facilitate the timely 874 payment of invoices received by the county, municipality, or 875 rural area of opportunity. This provision is included to 876 alleviate the financial hardships that certain rural counties 877 and municipalities encounter when administering agreements, and 878 must be exercised by the agency when a county or municipality 879 demonstrates financial hardship, to the extent that federal or 880 state law, rule, or other regulation allows such payments. This 881 paragraph may not be construed to alter or limit any other 882 provisions of federal or state law, rule, or other regulation. 883 2.âBy August 1, 2027, and each year thereafter, each state 884 agency shall report to the Office of Rural Prosperity on the 885 implementation of this paragraph for the preceding fiscal year. 886 The Office of Rural Prosperity shall summarize the information 887 received pursuant to this paragraph in its annual report as 888 required in s. 288.013. 889 Section 7.âSection 218.67, Florida Statutes, is amended to 890 read: 891 218.67âDistribution for fiscally constrained counties.â 892 (1)âEach county that is entirely within a rural area of 893 opportunity as designated by the Governor pursuant to s. 894 288.0656 or each county for which the value of a mill will raise 895 no more than $10 $5 million in revenue, based on the taxable 896 value certified pursuant to s. 1011.62(4)(a)1.a., from the 897 previous July 1, is shall be considered a fiscally constrained 898 county. 899 (2)âEach fiscally constrained county government that 900 participates in the local government half-cent sales tax shall 901 be eligible to receive an additional distribution from the Local 902 Government Half-cent Sales Tax Clearing Trust Fund, as provided 903 in s. 212.20(6)(d)6. s. 202.18(2)(c)1., in addition to its 904 regular monthly distribution provided under this part and any 905 emergency or supplemental distribution under s. 218.65. 906 (3)âThe amount to be distributed to each fiscally 907 constrained county shall be determined by the Department of 908 Revenue at the beginning of the fiscal year, using the prior 909 fiscal yearâs sales and use tax collections from the most recent 910 fiscal year that reports 12 months of collections July 1 taxable 911 value certified pursuant to s. 1011.62(4)(a)1.a., tax data, the 912 population as defined in s. 218.21, and the most current 913 calendar year per capita personal income, as initially reported 914 by the Bureau of Economic Analysis of the United States 915 Department of Commerce millage rate levied for the prior fiscal 916 year. The amount distributed shall be allocated based upon the 917 following factors: 918 (a)âThe contribution-to-revenue relative revenue-raising 919 capacity factor for each participating county must equal 100 920 multiplied by a quotient, the numerator of which is the countyâs 921 population and the denominator of which is the state sales and 922 use tax collections attributable to the county shall be the 923 ability of the eligible county to generate ad valorem revenues 924 from 1 mill of taxation on a per capita basis. A county that 925 raises no more than $25 per capita from 1 mill shall be assigned 926 a value of 1; a county that raises more than $25 but no more 927 than $30 per capita from 1 mill shall be assigned a value of 928 0.75; and a county that raises more than $30 but no more than 929 $50 per capita from 1 mill shall be assigned a value of 0.5. No 930 value shall be assigned to counties that raise more than $50 per 931 capita from 1 mill of ad valorem taxation. 932 (b)âThe personal-income local-effort factor must equal a 933 quotient, the numerator of which is the median per capita 934 personal income of participating counties and the denominator of 935 which is the countyâs per capita personal income shall be a 936 measure of the relative level of local effort of the eligible 937 county as indicated by the millage rate levied for the prior 938 fiscal year. The local-effort factor shall be the most recently 939 adopted countywide operating millage rate for each eligible 940 county multiplied by 0.1. 941 (c)âEach eligible countyâs proportional allocation of the 942 total amount available to be distributed to all of the eligible 943 counties must shall be in the same proportion as the sum of the 944 countyâs two factors is to the sum of the two factors for all 945 eligible counties. The proportional rate computation must be 946 carried to the fifth decimal place, and the amount to distribute 947 to each county must be rounded to the nearest whole dollar 948 amount. The counties that are eligible to receive an allocation 949 under this subsection and the amount available to be distributed 950 to such counties do shall not include counties participating in 951 the phaseout period under subsection (4) or the amounts they 952 remain eligible to receive during the phaseout. 953 (4)âFor those counties that no longer qualify under the 954 requirements of subsection (1) after the effective date of this 955 act, there shall be a 2-year phaseout period. Beginning on July 956 1 of the year following the year in which the value of a mill 957 for that county exceeds $10 $5 million in revenue, the county 958 shall receive two-thirds of the amount received in the prior 959 year, and beginning on July 1 of the second year following the 960 year in which the value of a mill for that county exceeds $10 $5 961 million in revenue, the county shall receive one-third of the 962 amount received in the last year that the county qualified as a 963 fiscally constrained county. Following the 2-year phaseout 964 period, the county is shall no longer be eligible to receive any 965 distributions under this section unless the county can be 966 considered a fiscally constrained county as provided in 967 subsection (1). 968 (5)(a)âThe revenues received under this section must be 969 allocated may be used by a county to be used for the following 970 purposes: 971 1.âFifty percent for public safety, including salary 972 expenditures for law enforcement officers or correctional 973 officers, as those terms are defined in s. 943.10(1) and (2), 974 respectively, firefighters as defined in s. 633.102, and 975 emergency medical technicians or paramedics as those terms are 976 defined in s. 401.23. 977 2.âThirty percent for infrastructure needs. 978 3.âTwenty percent for any public purpose. 979 (b)âThe revenues received under this section any public 980 purpose, except that such revenues may not be used to pay debt 981 service on bonds, notes, certificates of participation, or any 982 other forms of indebtedness. 983 Section 8.âPresent paragraphs (d) and (e) of subsection (7) 984 of section 288.001, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as 985 paragraphs (e) and (f), respectively, and a new paragraph (d) is 986 added to that subsection, to read: 987 288.001âThe Florida Small Business Development Center 988 Network.â 989 (7)âADDITIONAL STATE FUNDS; USES; PAY-PER-PERFORMANCE 990 INCENTIVES; STATEWIDE SERVICE; SERVICE ENHANCEMENTS; BEST 991 PRACTICES; ELIGIBILITY.â 992 (d)âNotwithstanding paragraphs (a), (b), and (c), the 993 network shall use funds directly appropriated for the specific 994 purpose of expanding service in rural communities as defined in 995 s. 288.0656, in addition to any funds allocated by the network 996 from other sources. The network shall use the funds to develop 997 an activity plan focused on network consultants and resources in 998 rural communities. In collaboration with regional economic 999 development organizations as defined in s. 288.018, the plan 1000 must provide for either full- or part-time consultants to be 1001 available for at least 20 hours per week in rural areas or to be 1002 permanently stationed in rural areas. This may include 1003 establishing a circuit in specific rural locations to ensure the 1004 consultantsâ availability on a regular basis. By using the funds 1005 to create a regular presence in rural areas, the network will 1006 strengthen community collaboration, raise awareness of available 1007 resources to provide opportunities for new business development 1008 or existing business growth, and make professional experience, 1009 education, and business information available in these essential 1010 communities. The network may dedicate funds to facilitate local 1011 or regional events that focus on small business topics, provide 1012 consulting services, and leverage partner organizations, such as 1013 the regional economic development organizations, local workforce 1014 development boards as described in s. 445.007, and Florida 1015 College System institutions. 1016 Section 9.âSection 288.007, Florida Statutes, is amended to 1017 read: 1018 288.007âInventory of communities seeking to recruit 1019 businesses.âBy September 30 of each year, a county or 1020 municipality that has a population of at least 25,000 or its 1021 local economic development organization, and each local 1022 government within a rural area of opportunity as defined in s. 1023 288.0656 or its regional economic development organization as 1024 defined in s. 288.018 or other local economic development 1025 organization, shall must submit to the department a brief 1026 overview of the strengths, services, and economic development 1027 incentives that its community offers. The local government or 1028 its local economic development organization also shall must 1029 identify any industries that it is encouraging to locate or 1030 relocate to its area. Unless otherwise required pursuant to this 1031 section, a county or municipality having a population of 25,000 1032 or less fewer or its local economic development organization 1033 seeking to recruit businesses may submit information as required 1034 in this section and may participate in any activity or 1035 initiative resulting from the collection, analysis, and 1036 reporting of the information to the department pursuant to this 1037 section. 1038 Section 10.âSection 288.013, Florida Statutes, is created 1039 to read: 1040 288.013âOffice of Rural Prosperity.â 1041 (1)âThe Legislature finds that the unique characteristics 1042 of the rural communities in this state are integral to making 1043 Florida an attractive place to visit, work, and live. The 1044 Legislature further finds that fostering a prosperous rural 1045 economy and vibrant rural communities serves the best interests 1046 of this state. Rural prosperity supports this stateâs 1047 infrastructure, housing, agricultural, and food-processing needs 1048 and advances the overall health of Floridaâs economy. It is 1049 essential that rural areas be able to grow and thrive, whether 1050 independently or through regional partnerships. To better serve 1051 rural communities, and in recognition of the unique challenges 1052 and opportunities they face, the Office of Rural Prosperity is 1053 established to ensure that state efforts to support rural 1054 Florida are coordinated, focused, and effective. 1055 (2)âThe Office of Rural Prosperity is created within the 1056 Department of Commerce to support rural communities by helping 1057 rural stakeholders navigate available programs and resources and 1058 by representing rural interests across state government. 1059 (3)âThe Governor shall appoint a director to lead the 1060 office, subject to confirmation by the Senate. The director 1061 shall report to the secretary of the department and shall serve 1062 at the pleasure of the secretary. 1063 (4)âThe office shall do all of the following: 1064 (a)âServe as the stateâs point of contact for rural local 1065 governments. 1066 (b)âAdminister the Rural Economic Development Initiative 1067 (REDI) pursuant to s. 288.0656. 1068 (c)âProvide training and technical assistance to rural 1069 local governments on a broad range of community and economic 1070 development activities. The training and technical assistance 1071 may be offered using communications technology or in person. In 1072 addition, the office shall post a recorded training and 1073 technical assistance video to the officeâs website which covers 1074 all of the required topics. The training and technical 1075 assistance must include, at a minimum, the following topics: 1076 1.âHow to access state and federal resources, including 1077 training on the online rural resource directory required under 1078 paragraph (d). 1079 2.âBest practices for comprehensive planning, economic 1080 development, and land development in rural communities. 1081 3.âStrategies to address staffing shortages and strengthen 1082 management functions in rural local governments. 1083 4.âRequirements of, and updates on recent changes to, the 1084 Community Planning Act under s. 163.3161. 1085 5.âUpdates on other recent state and federal laws affecting 1086 rural local governments. 1087 (d)âCreate and maintain an online rural resource directory 1088 to serve as an interactive tool for users to navigate state and 1089 federal resources, tools, and services available to rural local 1090 governments. The office shall ensure the directory is regularly 1091 updated and, to the greatest extent possible, includes current 1092 information on programs, resources, and services that address 1093 the needs of rural communities in all areas of governance. Each 1094 state agency shall routinely provide information and updates to 1095 the office to support maintenance of the directory. The 1096 directory must allow users to search by indicators, such as 1097 agency name, resource type, or topic, and include a notification 1098 feature that alerts users when new or updated resources are 1099 available. To the greatest extent possible, the directory must 1100 identify any financial match requirements associated with listed 1101 programs. 1102 (5)(a)âBy October 1, 2026, the office shall establish and 1103 provide staff for seven regional rural community liaison centers 1104 across this state to provide specialized in-person state support 1105 to rural local governments located in rural areas of opportunity 1106 as defined in s. 288.0656. The department shall, by rule, divide 1107 the state into seven regions and assign a liaison center to each 1108 region. Each liaison center shall serve the local governments 1109 within its geographic area and shall be staffed with at least 1110 two full-time department employees. At a minimum, each liaison 1111 center has the following powers and duties: 1112 1.âAssist local governments in planning and achieving goals 1113 related to local or regional growth, economic development, and 1114 rural prosperity. 1115 2.âFacilitate access to state and federal resources, 1116 including grants, loans, and other available assistance. 1117 3.âAdvise local governments on available program waivers, 1118 including financial match waivers or reductions for projects 1119 using state or federal funds through REDI under s. 288.0656. 1120 4.âCoordinate technical assistance needs with the 1121 department and other state or federal agencies. 1122 5.âPromote model ordinances, policies, and strategies 1123 related to economic development. 1124 6.âAssist local governments with regulatory and reporting 1125 compliance requirements. 1126 (b)âTo the greatest extent possible, each regional rural 1127 community liaison center shall coordinate with local and 1128 regional governmental entities, regional economic development 1129 organizations as defined in s. 288.018, and other appropriate 1130 entities to establish a network that fosters community-driven 1131 solutions promoting viable and sustainable rural communities. 1132 (c)âEach regional rural community liaison center shall 1133 regularly engage with REDI established in s. 288.0656, and at 1134 least one staff member from each liaison center shall attend the 1135 monthly REDI meeting, either in person or by means of electronic 1136 communication. 1137 (6)âBy December 1, 2026, and each year thereafter, the 1138 director of the office shall submit to the Administration 1139 Commission within the Executive Office of the Governor a written 1140 report describing the officeâs operations and accomplishments 1141 for the preceding year. The report must include the REDI report 1142 required by s. 288.0656(8). In consultation with the Department 1143 of Agriculture and Consumer Services, the office shall also 1144 include in the annual report recommendations for policies, 1145 programs, and funding initiatives to further support the needs 1146 of rural communities in this state. The office shall also submit 1147 the annual report to the President of the Senate and the Speaker 1148 of the House of Representatives by December 1 of each year and 1149 publish it on the officeâs website. At the next scheduled 1150 meeting of the Administration Commission following submission of 1151 the report, the director shall, in person, present detailed 1152 information from the report required under this subsection. 1153 (7)(a)âThe Office of Program Policy Analysis and Government 1154 Accountability (OPPAGA) shall evaluate the effectiveness of the 1155 office and submit a report of its findings, including any 1156 recommended policy or statutory changes, to the President of the 1157 Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives by 1158 December 15, 2027, and each year thereafter through 2029. 1159 Beginning in 2032, the report must be submitted every 3 years. 1160 (b)âOPPAGA shall review strategies implemented by other 1161 states for rural community preservation, enhancement, and 1162 revitalization and evaluate their effectiveness and potential 1163 applicability in this state. OPPAGA shall submit a report of its 1164 findings to the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the 1165 House of Representatives by December 15, 2028, and every 5 years 1166 thereafter. 1167 Section 11.âSection 288.014, Florida Statutes, is created 1168 to read: 1169 288.014âRenaissance Grants Program.â 1170 (1)âThe Legislature finds that it has historically provided 1171 programs to assist rural communities with economic development 1172 and to enhance their ability to attract businesses and that, by 1173 providing that extra component of economic viability, rural 1174 communities are able to attract new businesses and grow existing 1175 ones. However, the Legislature further finds that a subset of 1176 rural communities has decreased in population over the past 1177 decade, contributing to a decline in local business activity and 1178 economic development. The Legislature therefore determines that 1179 state assistance must evolve to support these communities in 1180 achieving the foundation necessary for economic viability. The 1181 intent of the Renaissance Grants Program is to reverse economic 1182 deterioration in such rural communities by retaining and 1183 attracting residents by giving them a reason to stay, which will 1184 stimulate natural economic growth, business opportunities, and 1185 improved quality of life. 1186 (2)âThe Office of Rural Prosperity within the department 1187 shall administer the Renaissance Grants Program to provide block 1188 grants to eligible counties. By October 1, 2026, the Office of 1189 Economic and Demographic Research shall certify to the Office of 1190 Rural Prosperity which counties are growth-impeded. For the 1191 purposes of this section, the term âgrowth-impededâ means a 1192 county that, as of the most recent population estimate, has 1193 experienced a declining population over the previous 10 years. 1194 After the initial certification, the Office of Economic and 1195 Demographic Research shall annually certify whether the county 1196 remains growth-impeded, until the office certifies the county 1197 has had 3 consecutive years of population growth. Upon such 1198 certification of population growth, the county remains eligible 1199 for the program for 1 additional year to prepare for the end of 1200 block grant funding. 1201 (3)(a)âEach participating county shall enter into an 1202 agreement with the Office of Rural Prosperity to receive block 1203 grant funds. Counties have broad authority to design their 1204 specific plan to achieve population growth consistent with this 1205 section. The Office of Rural Prosperity may not determine the 1206 manner in which a county implements its plan. However, regional 1207 rural community liaison center staff shall provide assistance in 1208 developing the countyâs plan, upon the countyâs request. 1209 (b)âEach participating county shall submit an annual report 1210 to the Office of Rural Prosperity detailing program activities, 1211 intergovernmental agreements, and other information as required 1212 by the office. 1213 (c)âEach participating county shall receive $1 million from 1214 the funds appropriated to the program, or an equal share of the 1215 funds appropriated if insufficient to provide that amount. 1216 Counties shall make all attempts to limit expenses for 1217 administrative costs, consistent with the need for prudent 1218 management and accountability in the use of public funds. 1219 Counties may supplement the block grant with other funding 1220 sources, including local, state, or federal grants, and may seek 1221 public or private contributions or in-kind support to advance 1222 program activities. 1223 (4)(a)âEach participating county shall hire and retain a 1224 renaissance coordinator, who may be funded from block grant 1225 proceeds. The renaissance coordinator is responsible for: 1226 1.âEnsuring that block grant funds are used as provided in 1227 this section; 1228 2.âCoordinating with other local governments, school 1229 boards, Florida College System institutions, and other partners; 1230 and 1231 3.âReporting as necessary to the state, including 1232 information necessary pursuant to subsection (7). 1233 (b)âThe Office of Rural Prosperity regional rural community 1234 liaison center staff shall, upon request, provide assistance and 1235 training to the renaissance coordinator to support successful 1236 implementation of the block grant. 1237 (5)âEach participating county shall design a plan for 1238 targeted community investments designed to achieve population 1239 growth and increase the economic vitality. The plan must include 1240 the following key features for use of the state support: 1241 (a)âTechnology centers located within schools or on school 1242 premises, administered by the local school board, providing 1243 extended hours and access for students. 1244 (b)âFacilities that colocate adult day care with child care 1245 facilities. The site-sharing facilities must be managed to also 1246 encourage interaction between generations and increase the 1247 health and well-being of younger and older participants, reduce 1248 social isolation, and create cost and time efficiencies for 1249 working families. The regional rural community liaison center 1250 staff of the Office of Rural Prosperity shall, upon request, 1251 assist the county with bringing recommendations to the Rural 1252 Economic Development Initiative or the appropriate state agency 1253 to streamline all required state permits, licenses, regulations, 1254 or other requirements. 1255 (c)âTechnology labs operated in partnership with the 1256 nearest Florida College System institution or a career center 1257 under s. 1001.44. Repurposed vacant industrial sites or existing 1258 office space must be given priority in the selection of lab 1259 locations. Each local technology lab must be staffed and open 1260 for extended hours with the capacity to provide: 1261 1.âAccess to trainers and equipment necessary for earning 1262 certificates or online degrees in technology; 1263 2.âHands-on assistance in securing remote work 1264 opportunities; and 1265 3.âStudio space equipped for remote technology-based work 1266 available for graduates and other qualifying residents. 1267 Participating counties may determine which residents receive 1268 priority access. Collaboration with community partners, 1269 including the local workforce development board as described in 1270 s. 445.007, to provide training opportunities, in-kind support 1271 such as transportation to and from the lab, financing of 1272 equipment for in-home use, or basic maintenance of such 1273 equipment is required. 1274 (6)âIn addition to hiring a renaissance coordinator, each 1275 participating county shall develop intergovernmental agreements 1276 for shared responsibilities with its municipalities, school 1277 board, and Florida College System institution or career center 1278 and enter into necessary contracts with providers and community 1279 partners in order to implement the plan. 1280 (7)(a)âEvery 2 years, beginning in 2027, the Auditor 1281 General shall conduct an operational audit as defined in s. 1282 11.45 of each countyâs grant activities. 1283 (b)âOn December 15, 2027, and every year thereafter, the 1284 Office of Economic and Demographic Research shall submit a 1285 report to the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the 1286 House of Representatives summarizing renaissance block grant 1287 recipients by county. The report must provide key economic 1288 indicators that measure progress in reversing long-term trends 1289 in the county. The Office of Rural Prosperity shall, upon 1290 request, provide any data necessary to complete the report. 1291 (8)âNotwithstanding s. 216.301, funds appropriated for the 1292 purposes of this section are not subject to reversion. 1293 (9)âThis section expires June 30, 2041. 1294 Section 12.âSection 288.0175, Florida Statutes, is created 1295 to read: 1296 288.0175âPublic Infrastructure Smart Technology Grant 1297 Program.â 1298 (1)âThe Public Infrastructure Smart Technology Grant 1299 Program is established within the Office of Rural Prosperity 1300 within the department to fund and support public infrastructure 1301 smart technology projects in communities located in rural areas 1302 of opportunity, subject to legislative appropriation. 1303 (2)âAs used in this section, the term: 1304 (a)ââPublic infrastructure smart technologyâ means systems 1305 or applications that use connectivity, data analytics, or 1306 automation to improve public infrastructure by increasing 1307 efficiency, enhancing public services, and promoting sustainable 1308 development. 1309 (b)ââRural area of opportunityâ has the same meaning as in 1310 s. 288.0656. 1311 (c)ââSmart regionâ means a geographic area that uses 1312 technology and innovative ideas to improve the quality of life 1313 for its citizens by addressing regional challenges through 1314 collaboration among government, businesses, and communities. 1315 (d)ââSmart technology lead organizationâ means a not-for 1316 profit corporation organized under s. 501(c)(3) of the Internal 1317 Revenue Code which has been in existence for at least 3 years 1318 and specializes in smart region planning. 1319 (3)(a)âThe Office of Rural Prosperity shall contract with 1320 one or more smart technology lead organizations to administer 1321 the grant program for the purpose of deploying public 1322 infrastructure smart technology in rural communities. Under such 1323 contracts, the smart technology lead organization shall award 1324 grants to counties and municipalities located within a rural 1325 area of opportunity for eligible public infrastructure smart 1326 technology projects. 1327 (b)âEach contract must specify deliverables, reporting 1328 requirements, timeframes, and any other term the office deems 1329 necessary. At a minimum, the contract must require the smart 1330 technology lead organization to: 1331 1.âCollaborate with counties and municipalities in rural 1332 areas of opportunity to identify cost-effective smart technology 1333 solutions for improving public services and infrastructure. 1334 2.âProvide technical assistance to counties and 1335 municipalities located in rural areas of opportunity in 1336 developing public infrastructure smart technology project plans. 1337 3.âFacilitate connections between rural communities and 1338 other entities, including companies and regional partners to 1339 maximize the impact of funded projects. 1340 (4)âThe Office of Rural Prosperity shall include a summary 1341 of projects funded under this section in its annual report 1342 required by s. 288.013(6). 1343 Section 13.âSubsections (1), (2), and (4) of section 1344 288.018, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 1345 288.018âRegional Rural Development Grants Program.â 1346 (1)(a)âFor the purposes of this section, the term âregional 1347 economic development organizationâ means an economic development 1348 organization located in or contracted to serve a rural area of 1349 opportunity, as defined in s. 288.0656 s. 288.0656(2)(d). 1350 (b)âSubject to appropriation, the Office of Rural 1351 Prosperity department shall establish a grant program to provide 1352 funding to regional economic development organizations for the 1353 purpose of building the professional capacity of those 1354 organizations. Building the professional capacity of a regional 1355 economic development organization includes hiring professional 1356 staff to develop, deliver, and provide needed economic 1357 development professional services, including technical 1358 assistance, education and leadership development, marketing, and 1359 project recruitment. Grants may also be used by a regional 1360 economic development organization to provide technical 1361 assistance to local governments, local economic development 1362 organizations, and existing and prospective businesses. 1363 (c)âA regional economic development organization may apply 1364 annually to the office department for a grant. The office 1365 department is authorized to approve, on an annual basis, grants 1366 to such regional economic development organizations. The office 1367 may award a maximum amount of $50,000 in a year to an 1368 organization may receive in any year will be $50,000, or 1369 $250,000 each to for any three regional economic development 1370 organizations that serve an entire region of a rural area of 1371 opportunity designated pursuant to s. 288.0656(7) if they are 1372 recognized by the office department as serving such a region. 1373 (2)âIn approving the participants, the office department 1374 shall require the following: 1375 (a)âDocumentation of official commitments of support from 1376 each of the units of local government represented by the 1377 regional organization. 1378 (b)âDemonstration that the organization is in existence and 1379 actively involved in economic development activities serving the 1380 region. 1381 (c)âDemonstration of the manner in which the organization 1382 is or will coordinate its efforts with those of other local and 1383 state organizations. 1384 (4)âExcept as otherwise provided in the General 1385 Appropriations Act, the office department may expend up to 1386 $750,000 each fiscal year from funds appropriated to the Rural 1387 Community Development Revolving Loan Fund for the purposes 1388 outlined in this section. 1389 Section 14.âSection 288.019, Florida Statutes, is amended 1390 to read: 1391 288.019âRural considerations in grant review and evaluation 1392 processes; financial match waiver or reduction.â 1393 (1)âNotwithstanding any other law, and to the fullest 1394 extent possible, each agency and organization the member 1395 agencies and organizations of the Rural Economic Development 1396 Initiative (REDI) as defined in s. 288.0656 s. 288.0656(6)(a) 1397 shall review: 1398 (a)âAll grant and loan application evaluation criteria and 1399 scoring procedures to ensure the fullest access for rural 1400 communities counties as defined in s. 288.0656 s. 288.0656(2) to 1401 resources available throughout this the state; and 1402 (b)âThe financial match requirements for projects in rural 1403 communities. 1404 (2)(1)âEach REDI agency and organization shall consider the 1405 impact on and ability of rural communities to meet and be 1406 competitive under such criteria, scoring, and requirements. Upon 1407 review, each REDI agency and organization shall review all 1408 evaluation and scoring procedures and develop a proposal for 1409 modifications to those procedures which minimize the financial 1410 and resource impact to a rural community, including waiver or 1411 reduction of any required financial match requirements impact of 1412 a project within a rural area. 1413 (a)(2)âEvaluation criteria and scoring procedures must 1414 provide for an appropriate ranking, when ranking is a component 1415 of the program, based on the proportionate impact that projects 1416 have on a rural area when compared with similar project impacts 1417 on an urban area. Additionally, 1418 (3)âevaluation criteria and scoring procedures must 1419 recognize the disparity of available fiscal resources for an 1420 equal level of financial support from an urban county or 1421 municipality and a rural county or municipality. 1422 (a)âThe evaluation criteria must should weight contribution 1423 in proportion to the amount of funding available at the local 1424 level. 1425 (b)âMatch requirements must be waived or reduced for rural 1426 communities. When appropriate, an in-kind match must should be 1427 allowed and applied as a financial match when a rural community 1428 county is experiencing economic financial distress as defined in 1429 s. 288.0656 through elevated unemployment at a rate in excess of 1430 the stateâs average by 5 percentage points or because of the 1431 loss of its ad valorem base. Donations of land, though usually 1432 not recognized as an in-kind match, may be treated as such. As 1433 appropriate, each agency and organization that applies for or 1434 receives federal funding must request federal approval to waive 1435 or reduce the financial match requirements, if any, for projects 1436 in rural communities. 1437 (3)(4)âFor existing programs, The proposal developed under 1438 subsection (2) modified evaluation criteria and scoring 1439 procedure must be submitted delivered to the Office of Rural 1440 Prosperity department for distribution to the REDI agencies and 1441 organizations. The REDI agencies and organizations shall review 1442 and make comments and recommendations that. Future rules, 1443 programs, evaluation criteria, and scoring processes must be 1444 brought before a REDI meeting for review, discussion, and 1445 recommendation to allow rural communities counties fuller access 1446 to the stateâs resources. 1447 (4)âEach REDI agency and organization shall ensure that 1448 related administrative rules or policies are modified, as 1449 necessary, to reflect the finalized proposal and that 1450 information about the authorized waiver or reduction is included 1451 in the online rural resource directory of the Office of Rural 1452 Prosperity required in s. 288.013(4)(d). 1453 (5)âThe rural liaison from the related regional rural 1454 community liaison center district shall assist the rural 1455 community to make waiver or reduction requests. 1456 Section 15.âSubsection (3) is added to section 288.021, 1457 Florida Statutes, to read: 1458 288.021âEconomic development liaison.â 1459 (3)âWhen practicable, the staff member appointed as the 1460 economic development liaison shall also serve as the agency 1461 representative for the Rural Economic Development Initiative 1462 pursuant to s. 288.0656. 1463 Section 16.âSection 288.065, Florida Statutes, is amended 1464 to read: 1465 288.065âRural Community Development Revolving Loan Fund.â 1466 (1)âThe Rural Community Development Revolving Loan Fund 1467 Program is established within the Office of Rural Prosperity 1468 department to facilitate the use of existing federal, state, and 1469 local financial resources by providing local governments with 1470 financial assistance to further promote the economic viability 1471 of rural communities. These funds may be used to finance 1472 initiatives directed toward maintaining or developing the 1473 economic base of rural communities, especially initiatives 1474 addressing employment opportunities for residents of these 1475 communities. 1476 (2)(a)âThe program shall provide for long-term loans, loan 1477 guarantees, and loan loss reserves to units of local 1478 governments, or economic development organizations substantially 1479 underwritten by a unit of local government., 1480 (b)âFor purposes of this section, the term âunit of local 1481 governmentâ means any of the following: 1482 1.âA county within counties with a population populations 1483 of 75,000 or less. fewer, or within any 1484 2.âA county with a population of 125,000 or less fewer 1485 which is contiguous to a county with a population of 75,000 or 1486 less. fewer 1487 3.âA municipality within a county described in subparagraph 1488 1. or subparagraph 2. 1489 4.âA county or municipality within a rural area of 1490 opportunity designated under s. 288.0656. 1491 1492 For purposes of this paragraph, population is determined in 1493 accordance with the most recent official estimates pursuant to 1494 s. 186.901 and must include those residing in incorporated and 1495 unincorporated areas of a county, based on the most recent 1496 official population estimate as determined under s. 186.901, 1497 including those residing in incorporated areas and those 1498 residing in unincorporated areas of the county, or to units of 1499 local government, or economic development organizations 1500 substantially underwritten by a unit of local government, within 1501 a rural area of opportunity. 1502 (c)(b)âRequests for loans must shall be made by application 1503 to the office department. Loans must shall be made pursuant to 1504 agreements specifying the terms and conditions agreed to between 1505 the applicant and the office department. The loans are shall be 1506 the legal obligations of the applicant. 1507 (d)(c)âAll repayments of principal and interest must shall 1508 be returned to the loan fund and made available for loans to 1509 other applicants. However, in a rural area of opportunity 1510 designated under s. 288.0656 by the Governor, and upon approval 1511 by the office department, repayments of principal and interest 1512 may be retained by the applicant if such repayments are 1513 dedicated and matched to fund regionally based economic 1514 development organizations representing the rural area of 1515 opportunity. 1516 (3)âThe office department shall manage the fund, 1517 establishing loan practices that must include, but are not 1518 limited to, procedures for establishing loan interest rates, 1519 uses of funding, application procedures, and application review 1520 procedures. The office has department shall have final approval 1521 authority for any loan under this section. 1522 (4)âNotwithstanding the provisions of s. 216.301, funds 1523 appropriated for this loan fund may purpose shall not be subject 1524 to reversion. 1525 (5)âThe office shall include in its annual report required 1526 under s. 288.013 detailed information about the fund, including 1527 loans made during the previous fiscal year, loans active, loans 1528 terminated or repaid, and the amount of funds not obligated as 1529 of 14 days before the date the report is due. 1530 Section 17.âSubsections (1), (2), and (3) of section 1531 288.0655, Florida Statutes, are amended, and subsection (6) is 1532 added to that section, to read: 1533 288.0655âRural Infrastructure Fund.â 1534 (1)âThere is created within the Office of Rural Prosperity 1535 department the Rural Infrastructure Fund to facilitate the 1536 planning, preparing, and financing of infrastructure projects in 1537 rural communities which will encourage job creation, capital 1538 investment, and the strengthening and diversification of rural 1539 economies by promoting tourism, trade, and economic development. 1540 Grants under this program may be awarded to a unit of local 1541 government within a rural area of opportunity or a rural 1542 community as those terms are defined in s. 288.0656 or to a 1543 regional economic development organization, a unit of local 1544 government, or an economic development organization 1545 substantially underwritten by a unit of local government for an 1546 infrastructure project located within an unincorporated area 1547 that has a population of 15,000 or less, has been in existence 1548 for 100 years or more, is contiguous to a rural community, and 1549 has been adversely affected by a natural disaster or presents a 1550 unique economic development opportunity of regional impact. 1551 (2)(a)âFunds appropriated by the Legislature must shall be 1552 distributed by the office department through grant programs that 1553 maximize the use of federal, local, and private resources, 1554 including, but not limited to, those available under the Small 1555 Cities Community Development Block Grant Program. 1556 (b)âTo facilitate access of rural communities and rural 1557 areas of opportunity as defined by the Rural Economic 1558 Development Initiative to infrastructure funding programs of the 1559 Federal Government, such as those offered by the United States 1560 Department of Agriculture and the United States Department of 1561 Commerce, and state programs, including those offered by Rural 1562 Economic Development Initiative agencies, and to facilitate 1563 local government or private infrastructure funding efforts, the 1564 office department may award grants for up to 75 percent of the 1565 total infrastructure project cost, or up to 100 percent of the 1566 total infrastructure project cost for a project located in a 1567 rural community as defined in s. 288.0656(2) which is also 1568 located in a fiscally constrained county as defined in s. 1569 218.67(1) or a rural area of opportunity as defined in s. 1570 288.0656(2). Eligible uses of funds may include improving any 1571 inadequate infrastructure that has resulted in regulatory action 1572 that prohibits economic or community growth and reducing the 1573 costs to community users of proposed infrastructure improvements 1574 that exceed such costs in comparable communities. Eligible uses 1575 of funds include improvements to public infrastructure for 1576 industrial or commercial sites and upgrades to or development of 1577 public tourism infrastructure. Authorized infrastructure may 1578 include the following public or public-private partnership 1579 facilities: storm water systems; telecommunications facilities; 1580 roads or other remedies to transportation impediments; nature 1581 based tourism facilities; or other physical requirements 1582 necessary to facilitate tourism, trade, and economic development 1583 activities in the community. Authorized infrastructure may also 1584 include publicly or privately owned self-powered nature-based 1585 tourism facilities, publicly owned telecommunications 1586 facilities, and additions to the distribution facilities of the 1587 existing natural gas utility as defined in s. 366.04(3)(c), the 1588 existing electric utility as defined in s. 366.02, or the 1589 existing water or wastewater utility as defined in s. 1590 367.021(12), or any other existing water or wastewater facility, 1591 which owns a gas or electric distribution system or a water or 1592 wastewater system in this state when: 1593 1.âA contribution-in-aid of construction is required to 1594 serve public or public-private partnership facilities under the 1595 tariffs of any natural gas, electric, water, or wastewater 1596 utility as defined herein; and 1597 2.âSuch utilities as defined herein are willing and able to 1598 provide such service. 1599 (c)âThe office department may award grants of up to 1600 $300,000 for infrastructure feasibility studies, design and 1601 engineering activities, or other infrastructure planning and 1602 preparation or site readiness activities. Site readiness 1603 expenses may include clearing title, surveys, permitting, 1604 environmental studies, and regulatory compliance costs. Grants 1605 awarded under this paragraph may be used in conjunction with 1606 grants awarded under paragraph (b). In evaluating applications 1607 under this paragraph, the office department shall consider the 1608 extent to which the application seeks to minimize administrative 1609 and consultant expenses. 1610 (d)âThe office department shall participate in a memorandum 1611 of agreement with the United States Department of Agriculture 1612 under which state funds available through the Rural 1613 Infrastructure Fund may be advanced, in excess of the prescribed 1614 state share, for a project that has received from the United 1615 States Department of Agriculture a preliminary determination of 1616 eligibility for federal financial support. State funds in excess 1617 of the prescribed state share which are advanced pursuant to 1618 this paragraph and the memorandum of agreement must shall be 1619 reimbursed when funds are awarded under an application for 1620 federal funding. 1621 (e)âTo enable local governments to access the resources 1622 available pursuant to s. 403.973(17), the office department may 1623 award grants for surveys, feasibility studies, and other 1624 activities related to the identification and preclearance review 1625 of land which is suitable for preclearance review. Authorized 1626 grants under this paragraph may not exceed $75,000 each, except 1627 in the case of a project in a rural area of opportunity, in 1628 which case the grant may not exceed $300,000. Any funds awarded 1629 under this paragraph must be matched at a level of 50 percent 1630 with local funds, except that any funds awarded for a project in 1631 a rural area of opportunity do not require a match of local 1632 funds. If an application for funding is for a catalyst site, as 1633 defined in s. 288.0656, the requirement for local match may be 1634 waived pursuant to the process in s. 288.06561. In evaluating 1635 applications under this paragraph, the office department shall 1636 consider the extent to which the application seeks to minimize 1637 administrative and consultant expenses. 1638 (3)âThe office department, in consultation with the 1639 Department of Transportation Florida Tourism Industry Marketing 1640 Corporation, the Department of Environmental Protection, and the 1641 Florida Fish and Wildlife Conservation Commission, as 1642 appropriate, shall review and certify applications pursuant to 1643 s. 288.061. The review must include an evaluation of the 1644 economic benefit and long-term viability. The office has 1645 department shall have final approval for any grant under this 1646 section. 1647 (6)âThe office shall include in its annual report required 1648 under s. 288.013 detailed information about the fund, including 1649 grants made for the year, grants active, grants terminated or 1650 complete, and the amount of funds not obligated as of 14 days 1651 before the date the report is due. 1652 Section 18.âSubsection (1), paragraphs (a), (b), and (e) of 1653 subsection (2), subsections (3) and (6), paragraphs (b) and (c) 1654 of subsection (7), and subsection (8) of section 288.0656, 1655 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 1656 288.0656âRural Economic Development Initiative.â 1657 (1)(a)âRecognizing that rural communities and regions 1658 continue to face extraordinary challenges in their efforts to 1659 significantly improve their economies, specifically in terms of 1660 personal income, job creation, average wages, and strong tax 1661 bases, it is the intent of the Legislature to encourage and 1662 facilitate the location and expansion of major economic 1663 development projects of significant scale in such rural 1664 communities. The Legislature finds that rural communities are 1665 the essential conduits for the economyâs distribution supply, 1666 manufacturing supply, and food supply. 1667 (b)âThe Rural Economic Development Initiative, known as 1668 âREDI,â is created within the Office of Rural Prosperity 1669 department, and all the participation of state and regional 1670 agencies listed in paragraph (6)(a) shall participate in this 1671 initiative is authorized. 1672 (2)âAs used in this section, the term: 1673 (a)ââCatalyst projectâ means a business locating or 1674 expanding in a rural area of opportunity to serve as an economic 1675 generator of regional significance for the growth of a regional 1676 target industry cluster. The project must provide capital 1677 investment on a scale significant enough to affect the entire 1678 region and result in the development of high-wage and high-skill 1679 jobs. 1680 (b)ââCatalyst siteâ means a parcel or parcels of land 1681 within a rural area of opportunity that has been prioritized as 1682 a geographic site for economic development through partnerships 1683 with state, regional, and local organizations. The site must be 1684 reviewed by REDI and approved by the department for the purposes 1685 of locating a catalyst project. 1686 (c)(e)ââRural communityâ means: 1687 1.âA county with a population of 75,000 or less fewer. 1688 2.âA county with a population of 125,000 or less fewer 1689 which is contiguous to a county with a population of 75,000 or 1690 less fewer. 1691 3.âA municipality within a county described in subparagraph 1692 1. or subparagraph 2. 1693 4.âAn unincorporated federal enterprise community or an 1694 incorporated rural city with a population of 25,000 or less 1695 fewer and an employment base focused on traditional agricultural 1696 or resource-based industries, located in a county not defined as 1697 rural, which has at least three or more of the economic distress 1698 factors identified in paragraph (a) (c) and verified by the 1699 Office of Rural Prosperity department. 1700 1701 For purposes of this paragraph, population must shall be 1702 determined in accordance with the most recent official estimate 1703 pursuant to s. 186.901. 1704 (3)âREDI shall be responsible for coordinating and focusing 1705 the efforts and resources of state and regional agencies on the 1706 problems which affect the fiscal, economic, and community 1707 viability of Floridaâs economically distressed rural 1708 communities, working with local governments, community-based 1709 organizations, and private organizations that have an interest 1710 in the growth and development of these communities to find ways 1711 to balance environmental and growth management issues with local 1712 needs. 1713 (6)(a)âBy August 1 of each year, the head of each of the 1714 following agencies and organizations shall designate a deputy 1715 secretary or higher-level staff person from within the agency or 1716 organization to serve as the REDI representative for the agency 1717 or organization: 1718 1.âThe Department of Transportation. 1719 2.âThe Department of Environmental Protection. 1720 3.âThe Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services. 1721 4.âThe Department of State. 1722 5.âThe Department of Health. 1723 6.âThe Department of Children and Families. 1724 7.âThe Department of Corrections. 1725 8.âThe Department of Education. 1726 9.âThe Department of Juvenile Justice. 1727 10.âThe Fish and Wildlife Conservation Commission. 1728 11.âEach water management district. 1729 12.âCareerSource Florida, Inc. 1730 13.âVISIT Florida. 1731 14.âThe Florida Regional Planning Council Association. 1732 15.âThe Agency for Health Care Administration. 1733 16.âThe Institute of Food and Agricultural Sciences (IFAS). 1734 (b)âAn alternate for each designee must shall also be 1735 chosen, who must also be a deputy secretary or higher-level 1736 staff person, and the names of the designees and alternates must 1737 shall be reported sent to the director of the Office of Rural 1738 Prosperity. At least one rural liaison from each regional rural 1739 community liaison center must participate in the REDI meetings 1740 Secretary of Commerce. 1741 (c)âREDI shall meet at least each month but may meet more 1742 frequently if necessary. Each REDI representative, or his or her 1743 designee, shall be physically present or available by means of 1744 electronic communication for each meeting. 1745 (d)(b)âEach REDI representative shall must have 1746 comprehensive knowledge of his or her agencyâs functions, both 1747 regulatory and service in nature, and of the stateâs economic 1748 goals, policies, and programs. This person shall be the primary 1749 point of contact for his or her agency with REDI on issues and 1750 projects relating to economically distressed rural communities 1751 and with regard to expediting project review, shall ensure a 1752 prompt effective response to problems arising with regard to 1753 rural issues, and shall work closely with the other REDI 1754 representatives in the identification of opportunities for 1755 preferential awards of program funds, contractual or other 1756 agreement provisions which meet the requirements of s. 215.971, 1757 and allowances and waiver of program requirements when necessary 1758 to encourage and facilitate rural growth, including, but not 1759 limited to, long-term private capital investment and job 1760 creation. 1761 (e)(c)âThe REDI representatives shall work with REDI in the 1762 review and evaluation of statutes and rules for adverse impact 1763 on rural communities and the development of alternative 1764 proposals to mitigate that impact. 1765 (f)(d)âEach REDI representative shall be responsible for 1766 ensuring that each district office or facility of his or her 1767 agency is informed quarterly about the Rural Economic 1768 Development Initiative and for providing assistance throughout 1769 the agency in the implementation of REDI activities. 1770 (7) 1771 (b)âDesignation as a rural area of opportunity under this 1772 subsection is shall be contingent upon the execution of a 1773 memorandum of agreement among the Office of Rural Prosperity 1774 department; the governing body of the county; and the governing 1775 bodies of any municipalities to be included within a rural area 1776 of opportunity. Such agreement must shall specify the terms and 1777 conditions of the designation, including, but not limited to, 1778 the duties and responsibilities of the county and any 1779 participating municipalities to take actions designed to 1780 facilitate the retention and expansion of existing businesses in 1781 the area, as well as the recruitment of new businesses to the 1782 area. 1783 (c)âEach rural area of opportunity may designate catalyst 1784 projects, provided that each catalyst project is specifically 1785 recommended by REDI and confirmed as a catalyst project by the 1786 department. All state agencies and departments shall use all 1787 available tools and resources to the extent permissible by law 1788 to promote the creation and development of each catalyst project 1789 and the development of catalyst sites. 1790 (8)âREDI shall submit a report to the Office of Rural 1791 Prosperity department on all REDI activities for the previous 1792 fiscal year as a supplement to the officeâs departmentâs annual 1793 report required under s. 288.013 s. 20.60. This supplementary 1794 report must include: 1795 (a)âA status report on every project all projects currently 1796 being coordinated through REDI;, the number of preferential 1797 awards and allowances made pursuant to this section in detail by 1798 award, allowance, or match type;, the dollar amount of such 1799 awards;, and the names of the recipients. 1800 (b)âA description of all waivers of program requirements 1801 granted, including a list by program of each waiver that was 1802 granted. If waivers were requested but were not granted, a list 1803 of ungranted waivers, including reasons why the waivers were not 1804 granted, must be included. 1805 (c)âDetailed information as to the economic impact of the 1806 projects coordinated by REDI. 1807 (d)âRecommendations based on the review and evaluation of 1808 statutes and rules having an adverse impact on rural communities 1809 and proposals to mitigate such adverse impacts. 1810 (e)âLegislative recommendations for statutory waivers or 1811 reductions of specified economic development or other program 1812 requirements, including financial match waivers or reductions, 1813 for applicants within rural areas of opportunity. 1814 (f)âOutcomes of proposals submitted pursuant to s. 288.019. 1815 Section 19.âSection 288.06561, Florida Statutes, is 1816 repealed. 1817 Section 20.âSubsections (2), (3), and (4) of section 1818 288.0657, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 1819 288.0657âFlorida rural economic development strategy 1820 grants.â 1821 (2)âThe Office of Rural Prosperity shall provide department 1822 may accept and administer moneys appropriated to the department 1823 for providing grants to assist rural communities to develop and 1824 implement strategic economic development plans. Grants may be 1825 provided to assist with costs associated with marketing a site 1826 to business and site selectors for an economic development 1827 project that is part of an economic development plan, either as 1828 part of funding to develop and implement a plan or related to an 1829 already adopted plan. 1830 (3)âA rural community, an economic development organization 1831 in a rural area, or a regional organization representing at 1832 least one rural community or such economic development 1833 organizations may apply for such grants. The rural liaison for 1834 the rural community shall assist those applying for such grants. 1835 (4)âThe office department shall establish criteria for 1836 reviewing grant applications. These criteria must shall include, 1837 but are not limited to, the degree of participation and 1838 commitment by the local community and the applicationâs 1839 consistency with local comprehensive plans or the applicationâs 1840 proposal to ensure such consistency. Grants for marketing may 1841 include funding for advertising campaign materials and costs 1842 associated with meetings, trade missions, and professional 1843 development related to site preparation and marketing. The 1844 office department shall review each application for a grant. The 1845 department may approve grants only to the extent that funds are 1846 appropriated for such grants by the Legislature. 1847 Section 21.âParagraph (a) of subsection (13) of section 1848 288.1226, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1849 288.1226âFlorida Tourism Industry Marketing Corporation; 1850 use of property; board of directors; duties; audit.â 1851 (13)âFOUR-YEAR MARKETING PLAN.â 1852 (a)âThe corporation shall, in collaboration with the 1853 department, develop a 4-year marketing plan. At a minimum, the 1854 marketing plan must discuss the following: 1855 1.âContinuation of overall tourism growth in this state. 1856 2.âExpansion to new or under-represented tourist markets. 1857 3.âMaintenance of traditional and loyal tourist markets. 1858 4.âCoordination of efforts with county destination 1859 marketing organizations, other local government marketing 1860 groups, privately owned attractions and destinations, and other 1861 private sector partners to create a seamless, four-season 1862 advertising campaign for the state and its regions. 1863 5.âDevelopment of innovative techniques or promotions to 1864 build repeat visitation by targeted segments of the tourist 1865 population. 1866 6.âConsideration of innovative sources of state funding for 1867 tourism marketing. 1868 7.âPromotion of nature-based tourism, including, but not 1869 limited to, promotion of the Florida Greenways and Trails System 1870 as described under s. 260.014 and the Florida Shared-Use 1871 Nonmotorized Trail Network as described under s. 339.81. 1872 8.âCoordination of efforts with the Office of Greenways and 1873 Trails of the Department of Environmental Protection and the 1874 department to promote and assist local communities, including, 1875 but not limited to, communities designated as trail towns by the 1876 Office of Greenways and Trails, to maximize use of nearby trails 1877 as economic assets, including specific promotion of trail-based 1878 tourism. 1879 9.âPromotion of heritage tourism. 1880 10.âDevelopment of a component to address emergency 1881 response to natural and manmade disasters from a marketing 1882 standpoint. 1883 11.âProvision of appropriate marketing assistance resources 1884 to small, rural, and agritourism businesses located in this 1885 state. Such resources may include, but are not limited to, 1886 marketing plans, marketing assistance, promotional support, 1887 media development, technical expertise, marketing advice, 1888 technology training, and social marketing support. 1889 Section 22.âSection 288.12266, Florida Statutes, is 1890 repealed. 1891 Section 23.âParagraph (f) of subsection (2) and paragraphs 1892 (a), (b), and (c) of subsection (4) of section 288.9961, Florida 1893 Statutes, are amended, and subsection (6) is added to that 1894 section, to read: 1895 288.9961âPromotion of broadband adoption; Florida Office of 1896 Broadband.â 1897 (2)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 1898 (f)ââUnderservedâ means a geographic area of this state in 1899 which there is no provider of broadband Internet service that 1900 offers a connection to the Internet with a capacity for 1901 transmission at a consistent speed of at least 100 megabits per 1902 second downstream and at least 20 10 megabits per second 1903 upstream. 1904 (4)âFLORIDA OFFICE OF BROADBAND.âThe Florida Office of 1905 Broadband is created within the Division of Community 1906 Development in the department for the purpose of developing, 1907 marketing, and promoting broadband Internet services in this 1908 state. The office, in the performance of its duties, shall do 1909 all of the following: 1910 (a)âCreate a strategic plan that has goals and strategies 1911 for increasing and improving the availability of, access to, and 1912 use of broadband Internet service in this state. In development 1913 of the plan, the department shall incorporate applicable federal 1914 broadband activities, including any efforts or initiatives of 1915 the Federal Communications Commission, to improve broadband 1916 Internet service in this state. The plan must identify available 1917 federal funding sources for the expansion or improvement of 1918 broadband. The strategic plan must be submitted to the Governor, 1919 the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of 1920 Representatives by June 30, 2022. The strategic plan must be 1921 updated biennially thereafter. The plan must include a process 1922 to review and verify public input regarding transmission speeds 1923 and availability of broadband Internet service throughout this 1924 state. The office shall consult with each regional rural 1925 community liaison center within the Office of Rural Prosperity 1926 on the development and update of the plan. 1927 (b)âBuild and facilitate local technology planning teams or 1928 partnerships with members representing cross-sections of the 1929 community, which may include, but are not limited to, 1930 representatives from the following organizations and industries: 1931 libraries, K-12 education, colleges and universities, local 1932 health care providers, private businesses, community 1933 organizations, economic development organizations, local 1934 governments, tourism, parks and recreation, and agriculture. The 1935 local technology planning teams or partnerships shall work with 1936 rural communities to help the communities understand their 1937 current broadband availability, locate unserved and underserved 1938 businesses and residents, identify assets relevant to broadband 1939 deployment, build partnerships with broadband service providers, 1940 and identify opportunities to leverage assets and reduce 1941 barriers to the deployment of broadband Internet services in the 1942 community. The teams or partnerships must be proactive in rural 1943 communities as defined in s. 288.0656 fiscally constrained 1944 counties in identifying and providing assistance, in 1945 coordination with the regional rural community liaison centers 1946 within the Office of Rural Prosperity, with applying for federal 1947 grants for broadband Internet service. 1948 (c)âProvide technical and planning assistance to rural 1949 communities in coordination with the regional rural community 1950 liaison centers within the Office of Rural Prosperity. 1951 (6)âBROADBAND REPORTING.â 1952 (a)âThe office shall submit to the Governor, the President 1953 of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives a 1954 quarterly report detailing the implementation of broadband 1955 activities in rural, unserved, and underserved communities. Such 1956 information must be listed by county and include the amount of 1957 state and federal funds allocated to and expended in the county 1958 by program; the progress toward deploying broadband in the 1959 county; any technical assistance provided; the activities of the 1960 local technology planning teams and partnerships; and the 1961 fulfillment of all other duties of the office required by this 1962 part. 1963 (b)âBy December 31 of each year, the office shall submit to 1964 the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of 1965 the House of Representatives an annual report on the officeâs 1966 operations and accomplishments for that calendar year and the 1967 status of broadband Internet service access and use in this 1968 state. The report must also incorporate the quarterly reports on 1969 rural, unserved, and underserved communities required by 1970 paragraph (a). 1971 Section 24.âSection 290.06561, Florida Statutes, is 1972 repealed. 1973 Section 25.âParagraph (a) of subsection (5) of section 1974 319.32, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1975 319.32âFees; service charges; disposition.â 1976 (5)(a)âForty-seven dollars of each fee collected, except 1977 for fees charged on a certificate of title for a motor vehicle 1978 for hire registered under s. 320.08(6), for each applicable 1979 original certificate of title and each applicable duplicate copy 1980 of a certificate of title shall be deposited as follows: into 1981 the State Transportation Trust Fund. Deposits to the State 1982 Transportation Trust Fund pursuant to this paragraph may not 1983 exceed $200 million in any fiscal year, and from any collections 1984 in excess of that amount during the fiscal year, 1985 1.âThe first $30 million collected shall be deposited into 1986 the Highway Safety Operating Trust Fund;, and 1987 2.âAny remaining collections shall be paid into the State 1988 Transportation Trust General Revenue Fund. 1989 Section 26.âSubsection (40) is added to section 334.044, 1990 Florida Statutes, to read: 1991 334.044âPowers and duties of the department.âThe department 1992 shall have the following general powers and duties: 1993 (40)âTo provide technical assistance and support from the 1994 appropriate district of the department to counties that are not 1995 located in a metropolitan planning organization created pursuant 1996 to s. 339.175. 1997 Section 27.âSection 339.0801, Florida Statutes, is amended 1998 to read: 1999 339.0801âAllocation of increased revenues derived from 2000 amendments to s. 319.32(5)(a) by ch. 2012-128.â 2001 (1)âThe first $200 million of funds that result from 2002 increased revenues to the State Transportation Trust Fund 2003 derived from the amendments to s. 319.32(5)(a) made by s. 11, 2004 chapter 2012-128, Laws of Florida, this act must be used 2005 annually, first as set forth in paragraph (a) subsection (1) and 2006 then as set forth in paragraphs (b), (c), and (d) subsections 2007 (2)-(4), notwithstanding any other provision of law: 2008 (a)1.(1)(a)âBeginning in the 2013-2014 fiscal year and 2009 annually for 30 years thereafter, $10 million shall be for the 2010 purpose of funding any seaport project identified in the adopted 2011 work program of the Department of Transportation, to be known as 2012 the Seaport Investment Program. 2013 2.(b)âThe revenues may be assigned, pledged, or set aside 2014 as a trust for the payment of principal or interest on revenue 2015 bonds, or other forms of indebtedness issued by an individual 2016 port or appropriate local government having jurisdiction 2017 thereof, or collectively by interlocal agreement among any of 2018 the ports, or used to purchase credit support to permit such 2019 borrowings. Alternatively, revenue bonds shall be issued by the 2020 Division of Bond Finance at the request of the Department of 2021 Transportation under the State Bond Act and shall be secured by 2022 such revenues as are provided in this subsection. 2023 3.(c)âRevenue bonds or other indebtedness issued hereunder 2024 are not a general obligation of the state and are secured solely 2025 by a first lien on the revenues distributed under this 2026 subsection. 2027 4.(d)âThe state covenants with holders of the revenue bonds 2028 or other instruments of indebtedness issued pursuant to this 2029 subsection that it will not repeal this subsection; nor take any 2030 other action, including but not limited to amending this 2031 subsection, that will materially and adversely affect the rights 2032 of such holders so long as revenue bonds or other indebtedness 2033 authorized by this subsection are outstanding. 2034 5.(e)âThe proceeds of any revenue bonds or other 2035 indebtedness, after payment of costs of issuance and 2036 establishment of any required reserves, shall be invested in 2037 projects approved by the Department of Transportation and 2038 included in the departmentâs adopted work program, by amendment 2039 if necessary. As required under s. 11(f), Art. VII of the State 2040 Constitution, the Legislature approves projects included in the 2041 departmentâs adopted work program, including any projects added 2042 to the work program by amendment under s. 339.135(7). 2043 6.(f)âAny revenues that are not used for the payment of 2044 bonds as authorized by this subsection may be used for purposes 2045 authorized under the Florida Seaport Transportation and Economic 2046 Development Program. This revenue source is in addition to any 2047 amounts provided for and appropriated in accordance with ss. 2048 311.07 and 320.20(3) and (4). 2049 (b)(2)âBeginning in the 2013-2014 fiscal year and annually 2050 thereafter, $10 million shall be transferred to the 2051 Transportation Disadvantaged Trust Fund, to be used as specified 2052 in s. 427.0159. 2053 (c)(3)âBeginning in the 2013-2014 fiscal year and annually 2054 thereafter, $10 million shall be allocated to the Small County 2055 Outreach Program to be used as specified in s. 339.2818. These 2056 funds are in addition to the funds provided for the program 2057 pursuant to s. 201.15(4)(a)1. 2058 (d)(4)âAfter the distributions required pursuant to 2059 paragraphs (a), (b), and (c) subsections (1)-(3), the remaining 2060 funds shall be used annually for transportation projects within 2061 this state for existing or planned strategic transportation 2062 projects which connect major markets within this state or 2063 between this state and other states, which focus on job 2064 creation, and which increase this stateâs viability in the 2065 national and global markets. 2066 (2)âThe remaining funds that result from increased revenue 2067 to the State Transportation Trust Fund derived pursuant to s. 2068 319.32(5)(a) must be used annually, notwithstanding any other 2069 law, beginning in the 2026-2027 fiscal year and annually 2070 thereafter, for the Small County Road Assistance Program as 2071 prescribed in s. 339.2816. 2072 (3)(5)âPursuant to s. 339.135(7), the department shall 2073 amend the work program to add the projects provided for in this 2074 section. 2075 Section 28.âSubsection (3) and paragraph (a) of subsection 2076 (4) of section 339.2816, Florida Statutes, are amended, and 2077 paragraph (c) of subsection (4) of that section is reenacted, to 2078 read: 2079 339.2816âSmall County Road Assistance Program.â 2080 (3)âBeginning with fiscal year 1999-2000 until fiscal year 2081 2009-2010, and beginning again with fiscal year 2012-2013, up to 2082 $25 million annually from the State Transportation Trust Fund 2083 must may be used for the purposes of funding the Small County 2084 Road Assistance Program as described in this section. In 2085 addition, beginning with the fiscal year 2026-2027, the 2086 department must use the additional revenues allocated by s. 2087 339.0801 for the program. 2088 (4)(a)âSmall counties shall be eligible to compete for 2089 funds that have been designated for the Small County Road 2090 Assistance Program for resurfacing or reconstruction projects on 2091 county roads that were part of the county road system on June 2092 10, 1995. Capacity improvements on county roads are shall not be 2093 eligible for funding under the program unless a safety issue 2094 exists or the department finds it necessary to widen existing 2095 lanes as part of a resurfacing or reconstruction project. 2096 (c)âThe following criteria must be used to prioritize road 2097 projects for funding under the program: 2098 1.âThe primary criterion is the physical condition of the 2099 road as measured by the department. 2100 2.âAs secondary criteria the department may consider: 2101 a.âWhether a road is used as an evacuation route. 2102 b.âWhether a road has high levels of agricultural travel. 2103 c.âWhether a road is considered a major arterial route. 2104 d.âWhether a road is considered a feeder road. 2105 e.âWhether a road is located in a fiscally constrained 2106 county, as defined in s. 218.67(1). 2107 f.âOther criteria related to the impact of a project on the 2108 public road system or on the state or local economy as 2109 determined by the department. 2110 Section 29.âSubsection (3) of section 339.2817, Florida 2111 Statutes, is amended, and subsection (6) is added to that 2112 section, to read: 2113 339.2817âCounty Incentive Grant Program.â 2114 (3)âThe department shall must consider, but is not limited 2115 to, the following criteria for evaluation of projects for County 2116 Incentive Grant Program assistance: 2117 (a)âThe extent to which the project will encourage, 2118 enhance, or create economic benefits; 2119 (b)âThe likelihood that assistance would enable the project 2120 to proceed at an earlier date than the project could otherwise 2121 proceed; 2122 (c)âThe extent to which assistance would foster innovative 2123 public-private partnerships and attract private debt or equity 2124 investment; 2125 (d)âThe extent to which the project uses new technologies, 2126 including intelligent transportation systems, which enhance the 2127 efficiency of the project; 2128 (e)âThe extent to which the project enhances connectivity 2129 between rural agricultural areas and market distribution 2130 centers; 2131 (f)âThe extent to which the project helps to maintain or 2132 protect the environment; and 2133 (g)(f)âThe extent to which the project includes 2134 transportation benefits for improving intermodalism and safety. 2135 (6)âBeginning in the 2026-2027 fiscal year, the department 2136 shall give priority to a county located, either wholly or 2137 partially, within the Everglades Agricultural Area as defined in 2138 s. 373.4592(15) which, notwithstanding subsection (4), requests 2139 100 percent of the project costs for an eligible project that 2140 meets the criteria established in subsection (3). Requests under 2141 this subsection are limited to $15 million annually. This 2142 subsection expires July 1, 2032. 2143 Section 30.âSubsections (1), (2), (3), (6), (7), and (8) of 2144 section 339.2818, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 2145 339.2818âSmall County Outreach Program.â 2146 (1)âThere is created within the department of 2147 Transportation the Small County Outreach Program. The purpose of 2148 this program is to assist small county governments in repairing 2149 or rehabilitating county bridges, paving unpaved roads, 2150 addressing road-related drainage improvements, resurfacing or 2151 reconstructing county roads, or constructing capacity or safety 2152 improvements to county roads. 2153 (2)âFor the purposes of this section, the term âsmall 2154 countyâ means any county that has a population of 200,000 or 2155 less as determined by the most recent official population census 2156 determination estimate pursuant to s. 186.901. 2157 (3)âFunds allocated under this program, pursuant to s. 4, 2158 ch. 2000-257, Laws of Florida, are in addition to any funds 2159 provided pursuant to s. 339.2816, for the Small County Road 2160 Assistance Program. 2161 (5)(6)âFunds paid into the State Transportation Trust Fund 2162 pursuant to ss. 201.15, 320.072, and 339.0801 s. 201.15 for the 2163 purposes of the Small County Outreach Program are hereby 2164 annually appropriated for expenditure to support the Small 2165 County Outreach Program. 2166 (6)(7)âSubject to a specific appropriation in addition to 2167 funds annually appropriated for projects under this section, a 2168 municipality within a rural area of opportunity or a rural area 2169 of opportunity community designated under s. 288.0656(7)(a) may 2170 compete for the additional project funding using the criteria 2171 listed in subsection (3) (4) at up to 100 percent of project 2172 costs, excluding capacity improvement projects. 2173 (8)âSubject to a specific appropriation in addition to 2174 funds appropriated for projects under this section, a local 2175 government either wholly or partially within the Everglades 2176 Agricultural Area as defined in s. 373.4592(15), the Peace River 2177 Basin, or the Suwannee River Basin may compete for additional 2178 funding using the criteria listed in paragraph (4)(c) at up to 2179 100 percent of project costs on state or county roads used 2180 primarily as farm-to-market connections between rural 2181 agricultural areas and market distribution centers, excluding 2182 capacity improvement projects. 2183 Section 31.âSection 339.68, Florida Statutes, is amended to 2184 read: 2185 (Substantial rewording of section. 2186 See s. 339.68, F.S., for present text.) 2187 339.68âFlorida Arterial Road Modernization Program.â 2188 (1)âThe Legislature finds that increasing demands continue 2189 to be placed on rural arterial roads in this state by a fast 2190 growing economy, continued population growth, and increased 2191 tourism. Investment in the rural arterial roads of this state is 2192 needed to maintain the safety, mobility, reliability, and 2193 resiliency of the transportation system in order to support the 2194 movement of people, goods, and commodities; to enhance economic 2195 prosperity and competitiveness; and to enrich the quality of 2196 life of the rural communities and the environment of this state. 2197 (2)âThe Florida Arterial Road Modernization Program is 2198 created within the department to make capacity and safety 2199 improvements to two-lane arterial roads or connect existing 2200 arterial roads located in rural communities. For purposes of 2201 this section, the term ârural communityâ has the same meaning as 2202 in s. 288.0656. 2203 (3)âBeginning in the 2026-2027 fiscal year, the department 2204 shall allocate from the State Transportation Trust Fund a 2205 minimum of $50 million in each fiscal year for purposes of 2206 funding the program. This funding is in addition to any other 2207 funding provided to the program by any other law. 2208 (4)âThe department shall use the following criteria to 2209 prioritize projects for funding under the program: 2210 (a)âWhether the road has documented safety concerns or 2211 requires additional safety and design improvements. This may be 2212 evidenced by the number of fatalities or crashes per vehicle 2213 mile traveled. 2214 (b)âWhether the road has or is projected to have a 2215 significant amount of truck tractor traffic as determined by the 2216 department. For purposes of this paragraph, the term âtruck 2217 tractorâ has the same meaning as in s. 320.01(11). 2218 (c)âWhether the road is used to transport agricultural 2219 products and commodities from a farm to the market or other sale 2220 or distribution point. 2221 (d)âWhether the road is used to transport goods to or from 2222 warehouses, distribution centers, or intermodal logistics 2223 centers as defined in s. 311.101(2). 2224 (e)âWhether the road is used as an evacuation route. 2225 (f)âWhether the physical condition of the road meets 2226 department standards. 2227 (g)âWhether the road currently has, or is projected to have 2228 within the next 5 years, a level of service of D, E, or F. 2229 (h)âAny other criteria related to the impact of a project 2230 on the public road system or on the state or local economy as 2231 determined by the department. 2232 (5)âBy January 3, 2028, and every 2 years thereafter, the 2233 department shall submit to the Governor, the President of the 2234 Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives a report 2235 regarding the use and condition of arterial roads located in 2236 rural communities, which report must include all of the 2237 following: 2238 (a)âA map of roads located in rural communities which are 2239 designated as arterial roads. 2240 (b)âA needs assessment that must include, but is not 2241 limited to, consideration of infrastructure improvements to 2242 improve capacity on arterial roads in rural communities. 2243 (c)âA synopsis of the departmentâs project prioritization 2244 process. 2245 (d)âAn estimate of the local and state economic impact of 2246 improving capacity on arterial roads in rural communities. 2247 (e)âA listing of the arterial roads and the associated 2248 improvements to be included in the program and a schedule or 2249 timeline for the inclusion of such projects in the work program. 2250 Section 32.â(1)âThe Department of Transportation shall 2251 allocate the additional funds provided by this act to implement 2252 the Small County Road Assistance Program as created by s. 2253 339.2816, Florida Statutes, and amend the current tentative work 2254 program for the 2026-2027 through 2032-2033 fiscal years to 2255 include additional projects. In addition, before adoption of the 2256 work program, the department shall submit a budget amendment 2257 pursuant to s. 339.135(7), Florida Statutes, requesting budget 2258 authority necessary to implement the additional projects. 2259 (2)âThe department shall allocate sufficient funds to 2260 implement the Florida Arterial Road Modernization Program as 2261 created by s. 339.68, Florida Statutes, develop a plan to expend 2262 the revenues as specified in s. 339.68, Florida Statutes, and, 2263 before its adoption, amend the current tentative work program 2264 for the 2026-2027 through 2032-2033 fiscal years to include the 2265 programâs projects. In addition, before adoption of the work 2266 program, the department shall submit a budget amendment pursuant 2267 to s. 339.135(7), Florida Statutes, requesting budget authority 2268 necessary to implement the program as specified in s. 339.68, 2269 Florida Statutes. 2270 (3)âNotwithstanding any other law, the increase in revenue 2271 to the State Transportation Trust Fund derived from the 2272 amendments to ss. 201.15 and 319.32, Florida Statutes, made by 2273 this act and deposited into the trust fund pursuant to ss. 2274 201.15 and 339.0801, Florida Statutes, must be used by the 2275 department to fund the programs as specified in this section. 2276 Section 33.âSection 341.0525, Florida Statutes, is created 2277 to read: 2278 341.0525âRural transit operating block grant program; 2279 administration; eligible projects.â 2280 (1)âThere is created a rural transit operating block grant 2281 program to be administered by the department. Rural transit 2282 block grant funds are available only to public transit providers 2283 not eligible to receive public transit block grants pursuant to 2284 s. 341.052. 2285 (2)âAt least $3 million must be allocated annually from the 2286 State Transportation Trust Fund for the program. At least 2287 $20,000 must be distributed to each eligible provider if 2288 application of the following formula provides less than that 2289 amount for any such provider: 2290 (a)âOne-third must be distributed according to the 2291 percentage that an eligible providerâs nonurbanized county 2292 population in the most recent year official population estimate 2293 pursuant to s. 186.901 is of the total population of all 2294 counties served by eligible providers. 2295 (b)âOne-third must be distributed according to the 2296 percentage that the total nonurbanized revenue miles provided by 2297 an eligible provider, as verified by the most recent National 2298 Transit Database report or a similar audited report submitted to 2299 the department, is of the total rural revenue miles provided by 2300 eligible providers in the state in that year. 2301 (c)âOne-third must be distributed according to the 2302 percentage that the total nonurbanized passengers carried by an 2303 eligible provider, as verified by the most recent National 2304 Transit Database report or a similar audited report submitted to 2305 the department, is of the total number of passengers carried by 2306 eligible providers in the state in that year. 2307 (3)âGrant funds must be used to pay public transit 2308 operating costs. State participation in such costs may not 2309 exceed 50 percent of such costs or an amount equal to the total 2310 revenue, excluding farebox, charter, and advertising revenue and 2311 federal funds, received by the provider for operating costs, 2312 whichever amount is less. 2313 (4)(a)âAn eligible provider may not use block grant funds 2314 to supplant local tax revenues made available to such provider 2315 for operations in the previous year; however, the Secretary of 2316 Transportation may waive this provision for public transit 2317 providers located in a county recovering from a state of 2318 emergency declared pursuant to part I of chapter 252. 2319 (b)âThe state may not give any county more than 39 percent 2320 of the funds available for distribution under this section or 2321 more than the amount local revenue sources provide to that 2322 county for its transit system. 2323 (5)âTo remain eligible to receive funding under the 2324 program, eligible providers must comply with s. 341.071(1) and 2325 (2). 2326 (6)(a)âAny funds distributed to an eligible provider 2327 pursuant to subsection (2) which cannot be expended within the 2328 limitations of the program must be returned to the department 2329 for redistribution to other eligible providers. 2330 (b)âThe department may consult with an eligible provider, 2331 before distributing funds to that provider, to determine whether 2332 the provider can expend its total block grant within the 2333 limitations of the program. If the department and the provider 2334 agree that the total block grant amount cannot be expended, the 2335 provider may agree to accept a block grant amount of less than 2336 the total amount, in which case the funds that exceed such 2337 lesser agreed-upon amount must be redistributed to other 2338 eligible providers. 2339 (c)âIf an audit reveals that an eligible provider expended 2340 block grant funds on unauthorized uses, the provider must repay 2341 to the department an amount equal to the funds expended for 2342 unauthorized uses. The department shall redistribute such 2343 repayments to other eligible providers. 2344 Section 34.âParagraph (b) of subsection (3) of section 2345 381.402, Florida Statutes, is amended, and paragraph (h) is 2346 added to subsection (2) of that section, to read: 2347 381.402âFlorida Reimbursement Assistance for Medical 2348 Education Program.â 2349 (2)âThe following licensed or certified health care 2350 practitioners are eligible to participate in the program: 2351 (h)âMedical doctors or doctors of osteopathic medicine who 2352 are board certified or board eligible in emergency medicine and 2353 employed by or under contract with a rural hospital as defined 2354 in s. 395.602(2)(b) or a rural emergency hospital as defined in 2355 s. 395.607(1)(a) to provide medical care in the rural hospitalâs 2356 or rural emergency hospitalâs emergency department. 2357 2358 Primary care medical specialties for physicians include 2359 obstetrics, gynecology, general and family practice, geriatrics, 2360 internal medicine, pediatrics, psychiatry, and other specialties 2361 which may be identified by the Department of Health. 2362 (3)âFrom the funds available, the Department of Health 2363 shall make payments as follows: 2364 (b)âAll payments are contingent on continued proof of: 2365 1.a.âPrimary care practice in a rural hospital as defined 2366 in s. 395.602(2)(b) or an underserved area designated by the 2367 Department of Health, provided the practitioner accepts Medicaid 2368 reimbursement if eligible for such reimbursement; or 2369 b.âEmergency medicine practice in a rural hospital as 2370 defined in s. 395.602(2)(b) or rural emergency hospital as 2371 defined in s. 395.607(1)(a), provided the practitioner accepts 2372 Medicaid reimbursement if eligible for such reimbursement; or 2373 c.âFor practitioners other than physicians, practice in 2374 other settings, including, but not limited to, a nursing home 2375 facility as defined in s. 400.021, a home health agency as 2376 defined in s. 400.462, or an intermediate care facility for the 2377 developmentally disabled as defined in s. 400.960. Any such 2378 setting must be located in, or serve residents or patients in, 2379 an underserved area designated by the Department of Health and 2380 must provide services to Medicaid patients. 2381 2.âProviding 25 hours annually of volunteer primary care 2382 services within the practitionerâs scope of practice in a free 2383 clinic as specified in s. 766.1115(3)(d)14. or through another 2384 volunteer program operated by the state pursuant to part IV of 2385 chapter 110 and approved by the department. In order to meet the 2386 requirements of this subparagraph, the volunteer hours must be 2387 verifiable in a manner determined by the department. 2388 Section 35.âSection 381.403, Florida Statutes, is created 2389 to read: 2390 381.403âRural Access to Primary and Preventive Care Grant 2391 Program.âThe Legislature recognizes that access to primary and 2392 preventive health care is critical for the well-being of the 2393 residents of this state. The Legislature also recognizes that 2394 many rural areas of this state have significantly fewer 2395 available physicians, physician assistants, and autonomous 2396 advanced practice registered nurses who serve those areas. To 2397 increase the availability of health care in such underserved 2398 rural areas, there is created the Rural Access to Primary and 2399 Preventive Care Grant Program within the Department of Health to 2400 use grants to incentivize the creation or expansion of health 2401 care practices in those areas. 2402 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 2403 (a)ââAutonomous advanced practice registered nurseâ means 2404 an advanced practice registered nurse who is registered under s. 2405 464.0123 to engage in autonomous practice. 2406 (b)ââMajority ownershipâ means ownership of more than 50 2407 percent of the interests in a private practice. 2408 (c)ââPhysicianâ means a physician licensed under chapter 2409 458 or chapter 459. 2410 (d)ââPhysician assistantâ means a physician assistant 2411 licensed under chapter 458 or chapter 459 to perform medical 2412 services delegated by a supervising physician. 2413 (e)ââPreventive careâ means routine health care services 2414 designed to prevent illness. The term includes, but is not 2415 limited to, general physical examinations provided on an annual 2416 basis, screenings for acute or chronic illnesses, and patient 2417 counseling to promote overall wellness and avoid the need for 2418 emergency services. 2419 (f)ââPrimary careâ means health care services focused 2420 primarily on preventive care, wellness care, and treatment for 2421 common illnesses. The term may include the health care provider 2422 serving as a patientâs entry point into the overall health care 2423 system and coordinating a patientâs care among specialists or 2424 acute care settings. The term does not include elective services 2425 provided solely for cosmetic purposes. 2426 (g)ââProgramâ means the Rural Access to Primary and 2427 Preventive Care Grant Program. 2428 (h)ââQualifying rural areaâ means a rural community as 2429 defined in s. 288.0657 in this state which is also designated as 2430 a health professional shortage area by the Health Resources and 2431 Services Administration of the United States Department of 2432 Health and Human Services. 2433 (2)âThe department shall award grants under the program to 2434 physicians, physician assistants, and autonomous advanced 2435 practice registered nurses who intend to open a new private 2436 practice in a qualifying rural area or who intend to open a new 2437 location within a qualifying rural area if the current private 2438 practice is located in a different county. To qualify for a 2439 grant, an applicant must meet all of the following criteria: 2440 (a)âThe practice must: 2441 1.âHave majority ownership by physicians, physician 2442 assistants, or autonomous advanced practice registered nurses, 2443 or a combination thereof. 2444 2.âBe physically located in a qualifying rural area and, at 2445 that location, serve patients who live in that qualifying rural 2446 area or in other nearby qualifying rural areas. The practice may 2447 also serve patients who reside outside of the qualifying rural 2448 area. While the practice may use telehealth to supplement the 2449 services provided at the location, the majority of services 2450 provided by the practice must be provided in-person at the 2451 physical location. 2452 3.âAccept Medicaid patients. 2453 4.âProvide services solely in primary care or preventative 2454 care, except that a physician, and any nurse licensed under 2455 chapter 464 or any physician assistant supervised by the 2456 physician, may provide services at the practice in primary care 2457 or preventative care, or services that are within the 2458 practitionerâs scope of practice, based on the physicianâs 2459 board-certified specialty in obstetrics, gynecology, general and 2460 family practice, geriatrics, internal medicine, pediatrics, or 2461 psychiatry. 2462 (b)âThe owners of the practice must commit to providing the 2463 following information to the department on an annual basis, and 2464 upon request by the department, for the duration of the contract 2465 entered into pursuant to subsection (6): 2466 1.âDeidentified patient encounter data. 2467 2.âA detailed report on the use of grant funds until such 2468 funds are expended. 2469 (3)âBy March 1, 2027, the department shall create an 2470 application process for eligible physicians, physician 2471 assistants, and autonomous advanced practice registered nurses 2472 to apply for grants under the program. The application must 2473 require a detailed budget of anticipated use of grant funds and 2474 an explanation of the manner in which the new or existing 2475 practice will meet the requirements of subsection (2). The 2476 department shall establish a ranking system to determine which 2477 applicants will be awarded grants if there are more applicants 2478 for the program than can be awarded grants with available 2479 appropriated funds. 2480 (4)âSubject to specific appropriation, the department may 2481 award grants of up to $250,000 to eligible applicants. Only one 2482 grant may be awarded per practice. Grant funds awarded for 2483 establishing a new private practice or a new practice location 2484 may be used for any of the following expenses: 2485 (a)âFacility construction, acquisition, renovation, or 2486 lease. 2487 (b)âPurchasing medical equipment. 2488 (c)âPurchasing or implementing information technology 2489 equipment or services. 2490 (d)âPurchasing or implementing telehealth technology. 2491 (e)âTraining on the use of medical equipment, information 2492 technology, or telehealth technology implemented under paragraph 2493 (b), paragraph (c), or paragraph (d), respectively. 2494 (5)âGrant funds may not be used for any of the following: 2495 (a)âSalaries. 2496 (b)âUtilities. 2497 (c)âInternet or telecommunications services other than 2498 those necessary for implementing telehealth technology under 2499 paragraph (4)(d). 2500 (d)âInsurance. 2501 (e)âIncidental maintenance and repairs. 2502 (f)âDisposable medical supplies. 2503 (g)âMedicines or vaccines. 2504 (h)âLicensing or certification fees, including costs for 2505 continuing education other than training under paragraph (4)(e). 2506 (6)âThe department shall enter into a contract with each 2507 grant recipient which details the requirements for the 2508 expenditure of grant funds by that recipient. The contract must 2509 include, at a minimum, all of the following: 2510 (a)âThe purpose of the contract. 2511 (b)âSpecific performance standards and responsibilities for 2512 the recipient under the contract, including penalties for not 2513 meeting such performance standards and responsibilities. 2514 (c)âA detailed project or contract budget, if applicable. 2515 (d)âReporting requirements for grant recipients to provide 2516 information to the department under paragraph (2)(b) as well as 2517 any additional information the department deems necessary for 2518 the administration of the program. 2519 (7)âThe department may adopt rules to implement the 2520 program. 2521 (8)âBeginning July 1, 2027, and each year thereafter in 2522 which there are outstanding contracts with grant recipients 2523 under subsection (6), the department shall provide a report to 2524 the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of 2525 the House of Representatives which includes, but need not be 2526 limited to, all of the following: 2527 (a)âEach grant awarded, including the proposed uses for 2528 each grant. 2529 (b)âThe progress on each outstanding contract. 2530 (c)âThe number of patients residing in rural areas who were 2531 served by grant awardees. 2532 (d)âThe number of Medicaid recipients who were served by 2533 grant awardees. 2534 (e)âThe number and types of services provided during 2535 patient encounters in locations opened under the program. 2536 (f)âThe number of health care practitioners, delineated by 2537 licensure type, providing services in locations opened under the 2538 program. 2539 (9)âThis section is repealed July 1, 2036, unless reviewed 2540 and saved from repeal through reenactment by the Legislature. 2541 Section 36.âSection 381.9856, Florida Statutes, is created 2542 to read: 2543 381.9856âStroke, Cardiac, and Obstetric Response and 2544 Education Grant Program.â 2545 (1)âPROGRAM CREATION.âThe Stroke, Cardiac, and Obstetric 2546 Response and Education (SCORE) Grant Program is created within 2547 the Department of Health. 2548 (2)âPURPOSE.âThe purpose of the program is to improve 2549 patient outcomes and the coordination of emergency medical care 2550 in rural communities by increasing access to high-quality 2551 stroke, cardiac, and obstetric care through the application of 2552 technology and innovative training, such as blended learning 2553 training programs. Blended learning training programs ensure 2554 that participants gain both the theoretical foundations of 2555 diagnosis and management as well as real-world clinical 2556 experience through scenario-based learning, ultimately enhancing 2557 decisionmaking and patient outcomes. 2558 (3)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 2559 (a)ââBlended learning training programâ means a structured 2560 educational model that uses blended learning methodologies, 2561 including simulation-based training, virtual reality, and 2562 distance learning technologies, in conjunction with hands-on 2563 instruction, such as simulation-based practice, and in-person 2564 skills sessions to provide comprehensive education. 2565 (b)ââHigh-risk care providerâ means a licensed health care 2566 facility or licensed ambulance service that regularly provides 2567 emergency or ongoing care to patients experiencing a stroke, 2568 heart attack, or pregnancy-related emergency. 2569 (c)ââRural communityâ has the same meaning as provided in 2570 s. 288.0657. 2571 (4)âGRANT PROGRAM REQUIREMENTS.â 2572 (a)âThe department shall award grants to high-risk care 2573 providers serving rural communities to accomplish at least one 2574 of the following initiatives: 2575 1.âImplement a blended learning training program for health 2576 care providers in stroke care protocols and best practices. 2577 2.âPurchase simulation equipment and technology for 2578 training. 2579 3.âEstablish telehealth capabilities between prehospital 2580 providers, such as paramedics or emergency medical technicians, 2581 and in-hospital providers, such as neurologists, to expedite 2582 emergency stroke care, emergency cardiac care, or emergency 2583 obstetric care. 2584 4.âDevelop quality improvement programs in one or more of 2585 the following specialty areas: emergency stroke care, emergency 2586 cardiac care, or emergency obstetric care. 2587 (b)âPriority must be given to proposals that: 2588 1.âDemonstrate collaboration between prehospital and in 2589 hospital providers; or 2590 2.âShow potential for significant improvement in patient 2591 outcomes in rural communities. 2592 (5)âFUNDING LIMITS; REPORTING.â 2593 (a)âIndividual grants may not exceed $100,000 per year. 2594 (b)âGrant recipients must submit quarterly reports to the 2595 department documenting program activities, expenditures, and 2596 outcomes. 2597 (6)âADMINISTRATION.âThe department shall monitor program 2598 implementation and outcomes. The department shall also submit an 2599 annual report to the Governor, the President of the Senate, and 2600 the Speaker of the House of Representatives by December 1 of 2601 each year, detailing program implementation and outcomes. 2602 (7)âRULEMAKING.âThe department may adopt rules to implement 2603 this section. 2604 (8)âIMPLEMENTATION.âThis section may be implemented only to 2605 the extent specifically funded by legislative appropriation. 2606 (9)âREPEAL.âThis section is repealed July 1, 2031, unless 2607 reviewed and saved from repeal through reenactment by the 2608 Legislature. 2609 Section 37.âSubsection (2) of section 395.6061, Florida 2610 Statutes, is amended to read: 2611 395.6061âRural hospital capital improvement.âThere is 2612 established a rural hospital capital improvement grant program. 2613 (2)(a)âEach rural hospital as defined in s. 395.602 shall 2614 receive a minimum of $100,000 annually, subject to legislative 2615 appropriation, upon application to the Department of Health, for 2616 projects to acquire, repair, improve, or upgrade systems, 2617 facilities, or equipment. Such projects may include, but are not 2618 limited to, the following: 2619 1.âEstablishing mobile care units to provide primary care 2620 services, behavioral health services, or obstetric and 2621 gynecological services in rural health professional shortage 2622 areas. 2623 2.âEstablishing telehealth kiosks to provide urgent care 2624 and primary care services remotely in rural health professional 2625 shortage areas. 2626 (b)âAs used in this subsection, the term: 2627 1.ââPreventive careâ means routine health care services 2628 designed to prevent illness. The term includes, but is not 2629 limited to, general physical examinations provided on an annual 2630 basis, screenings for acute or chronic illnesses, and patient 2631 counseling to promote overall wellness and avoid the need for 2632 emergency services. 2633 2.ââPrimary careâ means health care services focused 2634 primarily on preventive care, wellness care, and treatment for 2635 common illnesses. The term may include the health care provider 2636 serving as a patientâs entry point into the overall health care 2637 system and coordinating a patientâs care among specialists or 2638 acute care settings. The term does not include elective services 2639 provided solely for cosmetic purposes. 2640 3.ââRural health professional shortage areaâ means a rural 2641 community as defined in s. 288.0657 which is also designated as 2642 a health professional shortage area by the Health Resources and 2643 Services Administration of the United States Department of 2644 Health and Human Services. 2645 Section 38.âSubsection (3) of section 420.9073, Florida 2646 Statutes, is amended to read: 2647 420.9073âLocal housing distributions.â 2648 (3)âCalculation of guaranteed amounts: 2649 (a)âThe guaranteed amount under subsection (1) shall be 2650 calculated for each state fiscal year by multiplying $1 million 2651 $350,000 by a fraction, the numerator of which is the amount of 2652 funds distributed to the Local Government Housing Trust Fund 2653 pursuant to s. 201.15(4)(c) and the denominator of which is the 2654 total amount of funds distributed to the Local Government 2655 Housing Trust Fund pursuant to s. 201.15. 2656 (b)âThe guaranteed amount under subsection (2) shall be 2657 calculated for each state fiscal year by multiplying $1 million 2658 $350,000 by a fraction, the numerator of which is the amount of 2659 funds distributed to the Local Government Housing Trust Fund 2660 pursuant to s. 201.15(4)(d) and the denominator of which is the 2661 total amount of funds distributed to the Local Government 2662 Housing Trust Fund pursuant to s. 201.15. 2663 Section 39.âParagraph (n) of subsection (5) of section 2664 420.9075, Florida Statutes, is amended, paragraph (o) is added 2665 to that subsection, and paragraph (b) of subsection (13) of that 2666 section is reenacted, to read: 2667 420.9075âLocal housing assistance plans; partnerships.â 2668 (5)âThe following criteria apply to awards made to eligible 2669 sponsors or eligible persons for the purpose of providing 2670 eligible housing: 2671 (n)âFunds from the local housing distribution not used to 2672 meet the criteria established in paragraph (a), or paragraph 2673 (c), or paragraph (o) or not used for the administration of a 2674 local housing assistance plan must be used for housing 2675 production and finance activities, including, but not limited 2676 to, financing preconstruction activities or the purchase of 2677 existing units, providing rental housing, and providing home 2678 ownership training to prospective home buyers and owners of 2679 homes assisted through the local housing assistance plan. 2680 1.âNotwithstanding the provisions of paragraphs (a) and 2681 (c), program income as defined in s. 420.9071(26) may also be 2682 used to fund activities described in this paragraph. 2683 2.âWhen preconstruction due-diligence activities conducted 2684 as part of a preservation strategy show that preservation of the 2685 units is not feasible and will not result in the production of 2686 an eligible unit, such costs must shall be deemed a program 2687 expense rather than an administrative expense if such program 2688 expenses do not exceed 3 percent of the annual local housing 2689 distribution. 2690 3.âIf both an award under the local housing assistance plan 2691 and federal low-income housing tax credits are used to assist a 2692 project and there is a conflict between the criteria prescribed 2693 in this subsection and the requirements of s. 42 of the Internal 2694 Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, the county or eligible 2695 municipality may resolve the conflict by giving precedence to 2696 the requirements of s. 42 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 2697 as amended, in lieu of following the criteria prescribed in this 2698 subsection with the exception of paragraphs (a) and (g) of this 2699 subsection. 2700 4.âEach county and each eligible municipality may award 2701 funds as a grant for construction, rehabilitation, or repair as 2702 part of disaster recovery or emergency repairs or to remedy 2703 accessibility or health and safety deficiencies. Any other 2704 grants must be approved as part of the local housing assistance 2705 plan. 2706 (o)âNotwithstanding paragraphs (a) and (c), up to 25 2707 percent of the funds made available in each county and eligible 2708 municipality from the local housing distribution may be used to 2709 preserve multifamily affordable rental housing funded through 2710 United States Department of Agriculture loans. These funds may 2711 be used to rehabilitate housing, extend affordability periods, 2712 or acquire or transfer properties in partnership with private 2713 organizations. This paragraph expires on June 30, 2032. 2714 (13) 2715 (b)âIf, as a result of its review of the annual report, the 2716 corporation determines that a county or eligible municipality 2717 has failed to implement a local housing incentive strategy, or, 2718 if applicable, a local housing incentive plan, it shall send a 2719 notice of termination of the local governmentâs share of the 2720 local housing distribution by certified mail to the affected 2721 county or eligible municipality. 2722 1.âThe notice must specify a date of termination of the 2723 funding if the affected county or eligible municipality does not 2724 implement the plan or strategy and provide for a local response. 2725 A county or eligible municipality shall respond to the 2726 corporation within 30 days after receipt of the notice of 2727 termination. 2728 2.âThe corporation shall consider the local response that 2729 extenuating circumstances precluded implementation and grant an 2730 extension to the timeframe for implementation. Such an extension 2731 shall be made in the form of an extension agreement that 2732 provides a timeframe for implementation. The chief elected 2733 official of a county or eligible municipality or his or her 2734 designee shall have the authority to enter into the agreement on 2735 behalf of the local government. 2736 3.âIf the county or the eligible municipality has not 2737 implemented the incentive strategy or entered into an extension 2738 agreement by the termination date specified in the notice, the 2739 local housing distribution share terminates, and any uncommitted 2740 local housing distribution funds held by the affected county or 2741 eligible municipality in its local housing assistance trust fund 2742 shall be transferred to the Local Government Housing Trust Fund 2743 to the credit of the corporation to administer. 2744 4.a.âIf the affected local government fails to meet the 2745 timeframes specified in the agreement, the corporation shall 2746 terminate funds. The corporation shall send a notice of 2747 termination of the local governmentâs share of the local housing 2748 distribution by certified mail to the affected local government. 2749 The notice shall specify the termination date, and any 2750 uncommitted funds held by the affected local government shall be 2751 transferred to the Local Government Housing Trust Fund to the 2752 credit of the corporation to administer. 2753 b.âIf the corporation terminates funds to a county, but an 2754 eligible municipality receiving a local housing distribution 2755 pursuant to an interlocal agreement maintains compliance with 2756 program requirements, the corporation shall thereafter 2757 distribute directly to the participating eligible municipality 2758 its share calculated in the manner provided in ss. 420.9072 and 2759 420.9073. 2760 c.âAny county or eligible municipality whose local 2761 distribution share has been terminated may subsequently elect to 2762 receive directly its local distribution share by adopting the 2763 ordinance, resolution, and local housing assistance plan in the 2764 manner and according to the procedures provided in ss. 420.907 2765 420.9079. 2766 Section 40.âSubsections (1), (2), and (5) of section 2767 1001.451, Florida Statutes, are amended, and subsection (6) is 2768 added to that section, to read: 2769 1001.451âRegional consortium service organizations.âIn 2770 order to provide a full range of programs to larger numbers of 2771 students, minimize duplication of services, and encourage the 2772 development of new programs and services: 2773 (1)âSchool districts with 20,000 or fewer unweighted full 2774 time equivalent students, developmental research (laboratory) 2775 schools established pursuant to s. 1002.32, and the Florida 2776 School for the Deaf and the Blind may enter into cooperative 2777 agreements to form a regional consortium service organization. 2778 Each regional consortium service organization shall provide any, 2779 at a minimum, three of the following services determined 2780 necessary and appropriate by the board of directors: 2781 (a)âExceptional student education; 2782 (b)âSafe schools support teacher education centers; 2783 environmental education; 2784 (c)âState and federal grant procurement and coordination; 2785 (d)âData services processing; health 2786 (e)âInsurance services; 2787 (f)âRisk management insurance; 2788 (g)âProfessional learning; 2789 (h)âCollege, career, and workforce development; 2790 (i)âBusiness and operational services staff development; 2791 (j)âPurchasing; or 2792 (k)âPlanning and accountability. 2793 (2)(a)âEach regional consortium service organization 2794 composed that consists of four or more school districts is 2795 eligible to receive, through the Department of Education, 2796 subject to the funds provided in the General Appropriations Act, 2797 an allocation incentive grant of $150,000 $50,000 per school 2798 district and eligible member to be used for the delivery of 2799 services within the participating school districts. The 2800 determination of services and use of such funds must shall be 2801 established by the board of directors of the regional consortium 2802 service organization. The funds must shall be distributed to 2803 each regional consortium service organization no later than 30 2804 days following the release of the funds to the department. Each 2805 regional consortium service organization shall submit an annual 2806 report to the department regarding the use of funds for 2807 consortia services. Unexpended amounts in any fund in a 2808 consortiumâs current year operating budget must be carried 2809 forward and included as the balance forward for that fund in the 2810 approved operating budget for the following year. Each regional 2811 consortium service organization shall provide quarterly 2812 financial reports to member districts. 2813 (b)âMember districts shall designate a district to serve as 2814 a fiscal agent for contractual and reporting purposes. Such 2815 fiscal agent district is entitled to reasonable compensation for 2816 accounting and other services performed. The regional consortium 2817 service organization shall retain all funds received from grants 2818 or contracted services to cover indirect or administrative costs 2819 associated with the provision of such services. The regional 2820 consortium service organization board of directors shall 2821 determine the products and services to be provided by the 2822 consortium; however, in all contractual matters, the school 2823 board of the fiscal agent district shall act on proposed actions 2824 of the regional consortium service organization. 2825 (c)âThe regional consortium service organization board of 2826 directors shall recommend establishment of positions and 2827 individuals for appointment to the fiscal agent district. 2828 Personnel must be employed under the personnel policies of the 2829 fiscal agent district and are deemed to be public employees of 2830 the fiscal agent district. The regional consortium service 2831 organization board of directors may recommend a salary schedule 2832 and job descriptions specific to its personnel. 2833 (d)âThe regional consortium service organization may 2834 purchase or lease property and facilities essential for its 2835 operations and is responsible for their maintenance and 2836 associated overhead costs. 2837 (e)âIf a regional consortium service organization is 2838 dissolved, any revenue from the sale of assets must be 2839 distributed among the member districts as determined by the 2840 board of directors Application for incentive grants shall be 2841 made to the Commissioner of Education by July 30 of each year 2842 for distribution to qualifying regional consortium service 2843 organizations by January 1 of the fiscal year. 2844 (5)âThe board of directors of a regional consortium service 2845 organization may use various means to generate revenue in 2846 support of its activities, including, but not limited to, 2847 contracting for services to nonmember districts. The board of 2848 directors may acquire, enjoy, use, and dispose of patents, 2849 copyrights, and trademarks and any licenses and associated other 2850 rights or interests thereunder or therein. Ownership of all such 2851 patents, copyrights, trademarks, licenses, and associated rights 2852 or interests thereunder or therein shall vest in the state, with 2853 the board of directors having full right of use and full right 2854 to retain associated the revenues derived therefrom. Any funds 2855 realized from contracted services, patents, copyrights, 2856 trademarks, or licenses are shall be considered internal funds 2857 as provided in s. 1011.07. A fund balance must be established 2858 for maintaining or expanding services, facilities maintenance, 2859 terminal pay, and other liabilities Such funds shall be used to 2860 support the organizationâs marketing and research and 2861 development activities in order to improve and increase services 2862 to its member districts. 2863 (6)âA regional consortium service organization is 2864 authorized to administer the Regional Consortia Service 2865 Organization Supplemental Services Program under s. 1001.4511. 2866 Section 41.âSection 1001.4511, Florida Statutes, is created 2867 to read: 2868 1001.4511âRegional Consortia Service Organization 2869 Supplemental Services Program.â 2870 (1)âThere is created the Regional Consortia Service 2871 Organization Supplemental Services Program to increase the 2872 ability of regional consortium service organizations under s. 2873 1001.451 to provide programs and services to consortia members 2874 through cooperative agreements. Program funds may be used to 2875 supplement member needs related to transportation; district 2876 finance personnel services; property insurance, including 2877 property insurance obtained from any source; cybersecurity 2878 support; school safety; college, career, and workforce 2879 development; academic support; and behavior support within 2880 exceptional student education services. 2881 (2)âEach regional consortium service organization shall 2882 annually report to the President of the Senate and the Speaker 2883 of the House of Representatives the distribution of funds, 2884 including members awarded and services provided. 2885 (3)âNotwithstanding s. 216.301 and pursuant to s. 216.351, 2886 funds allocated for this purpose which are not disbursed by June 2887 30 of the fiscal year in which the funds are allocated may be 2888 carried forward for up to 5 years after the effective date of 2889 the original appropriation. 2890 Section 42.âSection 1009.635, Florida Statutes, is created 2891 to read: 2892 1009.635âRural Incentive for Professional Educators 2893 Program.â 2894 (1)âESTABLISHMENT.âThe Rural Incentive for Professional 2895 Educators (RIPE) Program is established within the Department of 2896 Education to support the recruitment and retention of qualified 2897 instructional personnel in rural communities. The program shall 2898 provide financial assistance for the repayment of student loans 2899 for eligible participants who establish permanent residency and 2900 employment in rural areas of opportunity. 2901 (2)âELIGIBILITY.âAn individual is eligible to participate 2902 in the RIPE Program if he or she does all of the following: 2903 (a)âEstablishes permanent residency on or after July 1, 2904 2026, in a rural area of opportunity as designated pursuant to 2905 s. 288.0656. The address on an individualâs state-issued 2906 identification card or driver license is evidence of residence. 2907 (b)âSecures full-time employment as a teacher or 2908 administrator in a private school as defined in s. 1002.01, or 2909 as instructional or administrative personnel as those terms are 2910 defined in s. 1012.01(2) and (3), respectively, in the public 2911 school district located within the same rural area of 2912 opportunity as he or she resides. 2913 (c)âHolds an associate degree, bachelorâs degree, 2914 postgraduate degree, or certificate from an accredited 2915 institution earned before establishing residency. 2916 (d)âHas an active student loan balance incurred for the 2917 completion of the qualifying degree or certificate. 2918 (3)âLOAN REPAYMENT.âEligible participants may receive up to 2919 $15,000 in total student loan repayment assistance over 5 years, 2920 disbursed in annual payments not to exceed $3,000 per year. 2921 Payments must be made directly to the lender servicing the 2922 participantâs student loan. 2923 (4)âAWARD DISTRIBUTION.âBefore disbursement of an award, 2924 the department shall verify that the participant: 2925 (a)âHas maintained continuous employment with the school 2926 district in an instructional or administrative position; 2927 (b)âHas received a rating of effective or highly effective 2928 pursuant to s. 1012.34; and 2929 (c)âHas not been placed on probation, had his or her 2930 certificate suspended or revoked, or been placed on the 2931 disqualification list, pursuant to s. 1012.796. 2932 (5)âADMINISTRATION.âThe program shall be administered by 2933 the Office of Student Financial Assistance within the Department 2934 of Education, which shall: 2935 (a)âDevelop application procedures requiring documentation, 2936 including proof of residency, verification of employment, 2937 official academic transcripts, and details of outstanding 2938 student loans; and 2939 (b)âMonitor compliance with program requirements. 2940 (6)âRULEMAKING.âThe State Board of Education shall adopt 2941 rules no later than January 31, 2027, to administer this 2942 section. 2943 Section 43.âSubsection (3) of section 1013.62, Florida 2944 Statutes, is amended to read: 2945 1013.62âCharter schools capital outlay funding.â 2946 (3)âIf the school board levies the discretionary millage 2947 authorized in s. 1011.71(2), the department must shall use the 2948 following calculation methodology to determine the amount of 2949 revenue that a school district must distribute to each eligible 2950 charter school: 2951 (a)âReduce the total discretionary millage revenue by the 2952 school districtâs annual debt service obligation incurred as of 2953 March 1, 2017, which has not been subsequently retired, and: 2954 1.âBeginning in the 2026-2027 fiscal year, for any district 2955 with an active project or an outstanding participation 2956 requirement balance, any amount of participation requirement 2957 pursuant to s. 1013.64(2)(a)8. that is being satisfied by 2958 revenues raised by the discretionary millage; or 2959 2.âFor construction projects for which Special Facilities 2960 Construction Account funding is sought beginning in the 2026 2961 2027 fiscal year, the value of 1 mill from the revenue generated 2962 pursuant to s. 1013.64(2)(a)8.b. 2963 (b)âDivide the school districtâs adjusted discretionary 2964 millage revenue by the districtâs total capital outlay full-time 2965 equivalent membership and the total number of full-time 2966 equivalent students of each eligible charter school to determine 2967 a capital outlay allocation per full-time equivalent student. 2968 (c)âMultiply the capital outlay allocation per full-time 2969 equivalent student by the total number of full-time equivalent 2970 students of each eligible charter school to determine the 2971 capital outlay allocation for each charter school. 2972 (d)âIf applicable, reduce the capital outlay allocation 2973 identified in paragraph (c) by the total amount of state funds 2974 allocated to each eligible charter school in subsection (2) to 2975 determine the maximum calculated capital outlay allocation. The 2976 amount of funds a school district must distribute to charter 2977 schools shall be as follows: 2978 1.âFor fiscal year 2023-2024, the amount is 20 percent of 2979 the amount calculated under this paragraph. 2980 2.âFor fiscal year 2024-2025, the amount is 40 percent of 2981 the amount calculated under this paragraph. 2982 3.âFor fiscal year 2025-2026, the amount is 60 percent of 2983 the amount calculated under this paragraph. 2984 4.âFor fiscal year 2026-2027, the amount is 80 percent of 2985 the amount calculated under this paragraph. 2986 5.âFor fiscal year 2027-2028, and each fiscal year 2987 thereafter, the amount is 100 percent of the amount calculated 2988 under this paragraph. 2989 (e)âSchool districts shall distribute capital outlay funds 2990 to eligible charter schools no later than February 1 of each 2991 year, as required by this subsection, based on the amount of 2992 funds received by the district school board. School districts 2993 shall distribute any remaining capital outlay funds, as required 2994 by this subsection, upon the receipt of such funds until the 2995 total amount calculated pursuant to this subsection is 2996 distributed. 2997 2998 By October 1 of each year, each school district shall certify to 2999 the department the amount of debt service that and participation 3000 requirement that complies with the requirement of paragraph (a) 3001 and can be reduced from the total discretionary millage revenue. 3002 Each school district shall also certify the amount of the 3003 participation requirement that complies with paragraph (a) or 3004 certify the value of 1 mill from revenue generated pursuant to 3005 s. 1013.64(2)(a)8.b. that can be reduced from the total 3006 discretionary millage revenue, as applicable. The Auditor 3007 General shall verify compliance with the requirements of 3008 paragraph (a) and s. 1011.71(2)(e) during scheduled operational 3009 audits of school districts. 3010 Section 44.âParagraph (a) of subsection (2) of section 3011 1013.64, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 3012 1013.64âFunds for comprehensive educational plant needs; 3013 construction cost maximums for school district capital 3014 projects.âAllocations from the Public Education Capital Outlay 3015 and Debt Service Trust Fund to the various boards for capital 3016 outlay projects shall be determined as follows: 3017 (2)(a)âThe department shall establish, as a part of the 3018 Public Education Capital Outlay and Debt Service Trust Fund, a 3019 separate account, in an amount determined by the Legislature, to 3020 be known as the âSpecial Facility Construction Account.â The 3021 Special Facility Construction Account shall be used to provide 3022 necessary construction funds to school districts which have 3023 urgent construction needs but which lack sufficient resources at 3024 present, and cannot reasonably anticipate sufficient resources 3025 within the period of the next 3 years, for these purposes from 3026 currently authorized sources of capital outlay revenue. A school 3027 district requesting funding from the Special Facility 3028 Construction Account shall submit one specific construction 3029 project, not to exceed one complete educational plant, to the 3030 Special Facility Construction Committee. A district may not 3031 receive funding for more than one approved project in any 3-year 3032 period or while any portion of the districtâs participation 3033 requirement is outstanding. The first year of the 3-year period 3034 shall be the first year a district receives an appropriation. 3035 The department shall encourage a construction program that 3036 reduces the average size of schools in the district. The request 3037 must meet the following criteria to be considered by the 3038 committee: 3039 1.âThe project must be deemed a critical need and must be 3040 recommended for funding by the Special Facility Construction 3041 Committee. Before developing construction plans for the proposed 3042 facility, the district school board must request a 3043 preapplication review by the Special Facility Construction 3044 Committee or a project review subcommittee convened by the chair 3045 of the committee to include two representatives of the 3046 department and two staff members from school districts not 3047 eligible to participate in the program. A school district may 3048 request a preapplication review at any time; however, if the 3049 district school board seeks inclusion in the departmentâs next 3050 annual capital outlay legislative budget request, the 3051 preapplication review request must be made before February 1. 3052 Within 90 days after receiving the preapplication review 3053 request, the committee or subcommittee must meet in the school 3054 district to review the project proposal and existing facilities. 3055 To determine whether the proposed project is a critical need, 3056 the committee or subcommittee shall consider, at a minimum, the 3057 capacity of all existing facilities within the district as 3058 determined by the Florida Inventory of School Houses; the 3059 districtâs pattern of student growth; the districtâs existing 3060 and projected capital outlay full-time equivalent student 3061 enrollment as determined by the demographic, revenue, and 3062 education estimating conferences established in s. 216.136; the 3063 districtâs existing satisfactory student stations; the use of 3064 all existing district property and facilities; grade level 3065 configurations; and any other information that may affect the 3066 need for the proposed project. 3067 2.âThe construction project must be recommended in the most 3068 recent survey or survey amendment cooperatively prepared by the 3069 district and the department, and approved by the department 3070 under the rules of the State Board of Education. If a district 3071 employs a consultant in the preparation of a survey or survey 3072 amendment, the consultant may not be employed by or receive 3073 compensation from a third party that designs or constructs a 3074 project recommended by the survey. 3075 3.âThe construction project must appear on the districtâs 3076 approved project priority list under the rules of the State 3077 Board of Education. 3078 4.âThe district must have selected and had approved a site 3079 for the construction project in compliance with s. 1013.36 and 3080 the rules of the State Board of Education. 3081 5.âThe district shall have developed a district school 3082 board adopted list of facilities that do not exceed the norm for 3083 net square feet occupancy requirements under the State 3084 Requirements for Educational Facilities, using all possible 3085 programmatic combinations for multiple use of space to obtain 3086 maximum daily use of all spaces within the facility under 3087 consideration. 3088 6.âUpon construction, the total cost per student station, 3089 including change orders, must not exceed the cost per student 3090 station as provided in subsection (6) unless approved by the 3091 Special Facility Construction Committee. At the discretion of 3092 the committee, costs that exceed the cost per student station 3093 for special facilities may include legal and administrative 3094 fees, the cost of site improvements or related offsite 3095 improvements, the cost of complying with public shelter and 3096 hurricane hardening requirements, cost overruns created by a 3097 disaster as defined in s. 252.34(2), costs of security 3098 enhancements approved by the school safety specialist, and 3099 unforeseeable circumstances beyond the districtâs control. 3100 7.âThere shall be an agreement signed by the district 3101 school board stating that it will advertise for bids within 30 3102 days of receipt of its encumbrance authorization from the 3103 department. 3104 8.a.(I)âFor construction projects for which Special 3105 Facilities Construction Account funding is sought before the 3106 2019-2020 fiscal year, the district shall, at the time of the 3107 request and for a continuing period necessary to meet the 3108 districtâs participation requirement, levy the maximum millage 3109 against its nonexempt assessed property value as allowed in s. 3110 1011.71(2) or shall raise an equivalent amount of revenue from 3111 the school capital outlay surtax authorized under s. 212.055(6). 3112 (II)âBeginning with construction projects for which Special 3113 Facilities Construction Account funding is sought in the 2019 3114 2020 fiscal year, the district shall, for a minimum of 3 years 3115 before submitting the request and for a continuing period 3116 necessary to meet its participation requirement, levy the 3117 maximum millage against the districtâs nonexempt assessed 3118 property value as authorized under s. 1011.71(2) or shall raise 3119 an equivalent amount of revenue from the school capital outlay 3120 surtax authorized under s. 212.055(6). 3121 (III)âBeginning with the 2026-2027 fiscal year, any 3122 district with an a new or active project or an outstanding 3123 participation requirement balance, funded under the provisions 3124 of this subsection, shall be required to budget no more than the 3125 value of 1 mill per year to the project until the districtâs 3126 participation requirement relating to the local discretionary 3127 capital improvement millage or the equivalent amount of revenue 3128 from the school capital outlay surtax is satisfied. 3129 b.âFor construction projects for which Special Facilities 3130 Construction Account funding is sought beginning in the 2026 3131 2027 fiscal year, the district shall, for a minimum of 3 years 3132 before submitting the request and for the initial year of the 3133 appropriation and the 2 years following the initial 3134 appropriation, levy the maximum millage against the districtâs 3135 nonexempt assessed property value as authorized under s. 3136 1011.71(2) or shall raise an equivalent amount of revenue from 3137 the school capital outlay surtax authorized under s. 212.055(6). 3138 The district is not required to budget the funds toward the 3139 project, but must use the funds as authorized pursuant to s. 3140 1011.71 or s. 212.055(6), as applicable. 3141 9.âIf a contract has not been signed 90 days after the 3142 advertising of bids, the funding for the specific project must 3143 shall revert to the Special Facility New Construction Account to 3144 be reallocated to other projects on the list. However, an 3145 additional 90 days may be granted by the commissioner. 3146 10.âThe department shall certify the inability of the 3147 district to fund the survey-recommended project over a 3148 continuous 3-year period using projected capital outlay revenue 3149 derived from s. 9(d), Art. XII of the State Constitution, as 3150 amended, paragraph (3)(a) of this section, and s. 1011.71(2). 3151 11.a.âFor projects funded before the 2026-2027 fiscal year, 3152 the district shall have on file with the department an adopted 3153 resolution acknowledging its commitment to satisfy its 3154 participation requirement, which is equivalent to all 3155 unencumbered and future revenue acquired from s. 9(d), Art. XII 3156 of the State Constitution, as amended, paragraph (3)(a) of this 3157 section, and s. 1011.71(2), in the year of the initial 3158 appropriation and for the 2 years immediately following the 3159 initial appropriation. 3160 b.âFor projects funded during the 2026-2027 fiscal year, 3161 and thereafter, the district shall have on file with the 3162 department an adopted resolution acknowledging its commitment to 3163 comply with the requirements of this paragraph. 3164 12.âPhase I plans must be approved by the district school 3165 board as being in compliance with the building and life safety 3166 codes before June 1 of the year the application is made. 3167 Section 45.âFor the 2026-2027 fiscal year, the sum of $1 3168 million in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is 3169 appropriated to the Florida Small Business Development Center 3170 Network under s. 288.001, Florida Statutes, to expand services 3171 in rural communities. The funds shall be allocated to the Office 3172 of Rural Prosperity budget entity within the Department of 3173 Commerce in the Special CategoriesâSBDCN Rural Services specific 3174 appropriation category. 3175 Section 46.â(1)âFor the 2026-2027 fiscal year, the sums of 3176 $1,827,591 in recurring funds and $652,327 in nonrecurring funds 3177 are appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to the Department 3178 of Commerce. 3179 (2)âThe recurring general revenue funds shall be allocated 3180 to the Office of Rural Prosperity budget entity in the following 3181 specific appropriations categories: $1,585,823 in Salaries and 3182 Benefits, $175,961 in Expenses, $50,000 in Contracted Services, 3183 $10,000 in Operating Capital Outlay, and $5,807 in Transfer to 3184 the Department of Management Services/Statewide Human Resources 3185 Contract. 3186 (3)âThe nonrecurring general revenue funds shall be 3187 allocated to the Office of Rural Prosperity budget entity in the 3188 following specific appropriations categories: $92,327 in 3189 Expenses and $560,000 in Acquisition of Motor Vehicles. 3190 (4)âThe Department of Commerce is authorized to establish 3191 17.00 full-time equivalent positions with associated salary rate 3192 of 1,060,000 in the Office of Rural Prosperity for the purpose 3193 of implementing this act. The following specific positions, 3194 classifications, and pay plans are authorized: 1.00 Director of 3195 General Operations, Class Code 9327, Pay Grade 940; 15.00 3196 Government Analyst II, Class Code 2225, Pay Grade 026; and 1.00 3197 Administrative Assistant II, Class Code 0712, Pay Grade 018. 3198 Section 47.âFor the 2026-2027 fiscal year, the recurring 3199 sum of $7 million from the General Revenue Fund is appropriated 3200 to the Office of Rural Prosperity within the Department of 3201 Commerce to implement the Renaissance Grants Program created by 3202 s. 288.014, Florida Statutes. Funds may not be used by the state 3203 for administrative costs. 3204 Section 48.âFor the 2026-2027 fiscal year, the recurring 3205 sum of $500,000 from the Grants and Donations Trust Fund within 3206 the Department of Commerce is appropriated to the Office of 3207 Rural Prosperity within the Department of Commerce to implement 3208 the Public Infrastructure Smart Technology Grant Program created 3209 by s. 288.0175, Florida Statutes. 3210 Section 49.âFor the 2026-2027 fiscal year, the sums of $4 3211 million in nonrecurring funds and $1 million in recurring funds 3212 from the General Revenue Fund are appropriated to the Office of 3213 Rural Prosperity within the Department of Commerce to implement 3214 the Rural Community Development Revolving Loan Fund under s. 3215 288.065, Florida Statutes, as amended by this act. 3216 Section 50.âFor the 2026-2027 fiscal year, the sums of $40 3217 million in nonrecurring funds and $5 million in recurring funds 3218 from the General Revenue Fund are appropriated to the Office of 3219 Rural Prosperity within the Department of Commerce to implement 3220 the Rural Infrastructure Fund under s. 288.0655, Florida 3221 Statutes, as amended by this act. 3222 Section 51.âFor the 2026-2027 fiscal year, the sum of 3223 $250,000 in recurring funds from the Grants and Donations Trust 3224 Fund within the Department of Commerce is appropriated to the 3225 Office of Rural Prosperity within the Department of Commerce to 3226 implement s. 288.0657, Florida Statutes, as amended by this act. 3227 Section 52.âFor the 2026-2027 fiscal year, the sum of $30 3228 million in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is 3229 appropriated to the Florida Housing Finance Corporation to be 3230 used to preserve affordable multifamily rental housing in rural 3231 communities funded through United States Department of 3232 Agriculture loans. The funds provided in this appropriation must 3233 be used to issue competitive requests for applications for the 3234 rehabilitation or acquisition of such properties to ensure 3235 continued affordability. By October 1, 2027, the Florida Housing 3236 Finance Corporation shall submit a report to the President of 3237 the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives on 3238 projects funded pursuant to this section, which report must 3239 include the number of units preserved and the financing 3240 portfolio for each project. 3241 Section 53.âFor the 2026-2027 fiscal year, the sum of $25 3242 million in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is 3243 appropriated to the Department of Health for the purpose of 3244 implementing the Rural Access to Primary and Preventive Care 3245 Grant Program created under s. 381.403, Florida Statutes. Grant 3246 funds shall be awarded over a 5-year period. Notwithstanding s. 3247 216.301, Florida Statutes, and pursuant to s. 216.351, Florida 3248 Statutes, the unexpended balance of funds appropriated pursuant 3249 to this section which is not disbursed by June 30 of the fiscal 3250 year in which funds are appropriated may be carried forward 3251 through the 2034-2035 fiscal year. 3252 Section 54.âFor the 2026-2027 fiscal year, the sum of $5 3253 million in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is 3254 appropriated to the Department of Health for the purpose of 3255 implementing the Stroke, Cardiac, and Obstetric Response and 3256 Education Grant Program under s. 381.9856, Florida Statutes. 3257 Notwithstanding s. 216.301, Florida Statutes, and pursuant to s. 3258 216.351, Florida Statutes, the unexpended balance of funds 3259 appropriated pursuant to this section which is not disbursed by 3260 June 30 of the fiscal year in which funds are appropriated may 3261 be carried forward through the 2030-2031 fiscal year. 3262 Section 55.âFor the 2026-2027 fiscal year, the sum of $25 3263 million in nonrecurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is 3264 appropriated to the Department of Health for the purpose of 3265 implementing the rural hospital capital improvement grant 3266 program under s. 395.6061, Florida Statutes. 3267 Section 56.âFor the 2026-2027 fiscal year, the sums of 3268 $186,729 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund and 3269 $250,884 in recurring funds from the Medical Care Trust Fund are 3270 appropriated to the Agency for Health Care Administration to 3271 establish a Diagnosis-Related Grouping (DRG) reimbursement 3272 methodology for critical access hospitals, as defined in s. 3273 408.07, Florida Statutes, for the purpose of providing inpatient 3274 reimbursement to such a hospital in amounts comparable to the 3275 reimbursement the hospital would receive for inpatient services 3276 from the federal Medicare program. The 2026-2027 fiscal year 3277 General Appropriations Act shall establish the DRG reimbursement 3278 methodology for critical access hospital inpatient services as 3279 directed in s. 409.905(5)(c), Florida Statutes. Health plans 3280 that participate in the Statewide Medicaid Managed Care program 3281 shall pass through the fee increase to providers in this 3282 appropriation. 3283 Section 57.âFor the 2026-2027 fiscal year, the sums of 3284 $7,487,068 in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund and 3285 $10,059,377 in recurring funds from the Medical Care Trust Fund 3286 are appropriated to the Agency for Health Care Administration to 3287 establish an Enhanced Ambulatory Patient Grouping (EAPG) 3288 reimbursement methodology for critical access hospitals, as 3289 defined in s. 408.07, Florida Statutes, for the purpose of 3290 providing outpatient reimbursement to such a hospital in amounts 3291 comparable to the reimbursement the hospital would receive for 3292 outpatient services from the federal Medicare program. The 2026 3293 2027 fiscal year General Appropriations Act shall establish the 3294 EAPG reimbursement methodology for critical access hospital 3295 outpatient services as directed in s. 409.905(6)(b), Florida 3296 Statutes. Health plans that participate in the Statewide 3297 Medicaid Managed Care program shall pass through the fee 3298 increase to providers in this appropriation. 3299 Section 58.âFor the 2026-2027 fiscal year, the sum of $3.6 3300 million in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is 3301 appropriated to the Department of Education to implement s. 3302 1001.451, Florida Statutes, as amended by this act. 3303 Section 59.âFor the 2026-2027 fiscal year, the sum of $25 3304 million in recurring funds is appropriated from the General 3305 Revenue Fund to the Department of Education to be distributed to 3306 regional consortium service organizations under s. 1001.451, 3307 Florida Statutes, in order to provide funds pursuant to s. 3308 1001.4511, Florida Statutes. These funds shall be allocated as 3309 follows: $5,555,149 to the Heartland Educational Consortium; 3310 $11,912,923 to the North East Florida Educational Consortium; 3311 and $7,531,928 to the Panhandle Area Educational Consortium. The 3312 funds must be distributed to each regional consortium service 3313 organization no later than 30 days following the release of the 3314 funds to the department. 3315 Section 60.âFor the 2026-2027 fiscal year, the sum of $7 3316 million in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund is 3317 appropriated to the Department of Education to implement the 3318 Rural Incentive for Professional Educators (RIPE) Program, s. 3319 1009.635, Florida Statutes, as created by this act. 3320 Section 61.âSubsection (3) of section 163.3187, Florida 3321 Statutes, is amended to read: 3322 163.3187âProcess for adoption of small scale comprehensive 3323 plan amendment.â 3324 (3)âIf the small scale development amendment involves a 3325 site within a rural area of opportunity as defined under s. 3326 288.0656 s. 288.0656(2)(d) for the duration of such designation, 3327 the acreage limit listed in subsection (1) must shall be 3328 increased by 100 percent. The local government approving the 3329 small scale plan amendment shall certify to the state land 3330 planning agency that the plan amendment furthers the economic 3331 objectives set forth in the executive order issued under s. 3332 288.0656(7), and the property subject to the plan amendment 3333 shall undergo public review to ensure that all concurrency 3334 requirements and federal, state, and local environmental permit 3335 requirements are met. 3336 Section 62.âSection 212.205, Florida Statutes, is amended 3337 to read: 3338 212.205âSales tax distribution reporting.âBy March 15 of 3339 each year, each person who received a distribution pursuant to 3340 s. 212.20(6)(d)7.b. and c. s. 212.20(6)(d)6.b. and c. in the 3341 preceding calendar year shall report to the Office of Economic 3342 and Demographic Research the following information: 3343 (1)âAn itemized accounting of all expenditures of the funds 3344 distributed in the preceding calendar year, including amounts 3345 spent on debt service. 3346 (2)âA statement indicating what portion of the distributed 3347 funds have been pledged for debt service. 3348 (3)âThe original principal amount and current debt service 3349 schedule of any bonds or other borrowing for which the 3350 distributed funds have been pledged for debt service. 3351 Section 63.âSection 257.191, Florida Statutes, is amended 3352 to read: 3353 257.191âConstruction grants.âThe Division of Library and 3354 Information Services may accept and administer library 3355 construction moneys appropriated to it and shall allocate such 3356 appropriation to municipal, county, and regional libraries in 3357 the form of library construction grants on a matching basis. The 3358 local matching portion shall be no less than the grant amount, 3359 on a dollar-for-dollar basis, up to the maximum grant amount, 3360 unless the matching requirement is waived pursuant to s. 288.019 3361 by s. 288.06561. Initiation of a library construction project 12 3362 months or less prior to the grant award under this section does 3363 shall not affect the eligibility of an applicant to receive a 3364 library construction grant. The division shall adopt rules for 3365 the administration of library construction grants. For the 3366 purposes of this section, s. 257.21 does not apply. 3367 Section 64.âSubsection (2) of section 257.193, Florida 3368 Statutes, is amended to read: 3369 257.193âCommunity Libraries in Caring Program.â 3370 (2)âThe purpose of the Community Libraries in Caring 3371 Program is to assist libraries in rural communities, as defined 3372 in s. 288.0656(2) and subject to the provisions of s. 288.019 s. 3373 288.06561, to strengthen their collections and services, improve 3374 literacy in their communities, and improve the economic 3375 viability of their communities. 3376 Section 65.âSubsection (17) of section 265.283, Florida 3377 Statutes, is amended to read: 3378 265.283âDefinitions.âThe following definitions shall apply 3379 to ss. 265.281-265.703: 3380 (17)ââUnderserved arts community assistance program grantsâ 3381 means grants used by qualified organizations under the Rural 3382 Economic Development Initiative, pursuant to s. 288.0656 and 3383 subject to s. 288.019 ss. 288.0656 and 288.06561, for the 3384 purpose of economic and organizational development for 3385 underserved cultural organizations. 3386 Section 66.âParagraphs (a) and (d) of subsection (3) of 3387 section 288.11621, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 3388 288.11621âSpring training baseball franchises.â 3389 (3)âUSE OF FUNDS.â 3390 (a)âA certified applicant may use funds provided under s. 3391 212.20(6)(d)7.b. s. 212.20(6)(d)6.b. only to: 3392 1.âServe the public purpose of acquiring, constructing, 3393 reconstructing, or renovating a facility for a spring training 3394 franchise. 3395 2.âPay or pledge for the payment of debt service on, or to 3396 fund debt service reserve funds, arbitrage rebate obligations, 3397 or other amounts payable with respect thereto, bonds issued for 3398 the acquisition, construction, reconstruction, or renovation of 3399 such facility, or for the reimbursement of such costs or the 3400 refinancing of bonds issued for such purposes. 3401 3.âAssist in the relocation of a spring training franchise 3402 from one unit of local government to another only if the 3403 governing board of the current host local government by a 3404 majority vote agrees to relocation. 3405 (d)1.âAll certified applicants must place unexpended state 3406 funds received pursuant to s. 212.20(6)(d)7.b. s. 3407 212.20(6)(d)6.b. in a trust fund or separate account for use 3408 only as authorized in this section. 3409 2.âA certified applicant may request that the Department of 3410 Revenue suspend further distributions of state funds made 3411 available under s. 212.20(6)(d)7.b. s. 212.20(6)(d)6.b. for 12 3412 months after expiration of an existing agreement with a spring 3413 training franchise to provide the certified applicant with an 3414 opportunity to enter into a new agreement with a spring training 3415 franchise, at which time the distributions shall resume. 3416 3.âThe expenditure of state funds distributed to an 3417 applicant certified before July 1, 2010, must begin within 48 3418 months after the initial receipt of the state funds. In 3419 addition, the construction of, or capital improvements to, a 3420 spring training facility must be completed within 24 months 3421 after the projectâs commencement. 3422 Section 67.âParagraph (c) of subsection (2) and paragraphs 3423 (a), (c), and (d) of subsection (3) of section 288.11631, 3424 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 3425 288.11631âRetention of Major League Baseball spring 3426 training baseball franchises.â 3427 (2)âCERTIFICATION PROCESS.â 3428 (c)âEach applicant certified on or after July 1, 2013, 3429 shall enter into an agreement with the department which: 3430 1.âSpecifies the amount of the state incentive funding to 3431 be distributed. The amount of state incentive funding per 3432 certified applicant may not exceed $20 million. However, if a 3433 certified applicantâs facility is used by more than one spring 3434 training franchise, the maximum amount may not exceed $50 3435 million, and the Department of Revenue shall make distributions 3436 to the applicant pursuant to s. 212.20(6)(d)7.c. s. 3437 212.20(6)(d)6.c. 3438 2.âStates the criteria that the certified applicant must 3439 meet in order to remain certified. These criteria must include a 3440 provision stating that the spring training franchise must 3441 reimburse the state for any funds received if the franchise does 3442 not comply with the terms of the contract. If bonds were issued 3443 to construct or renovate a facility for a spring training 3444 franchise, the required reimbursement must be equal to the total 3445 amount of state distributions expected to be paid from the date 3446 the franchise violates the agreement with the applicant through 3447 the final maturity of the bonds. 3448 3.âStates that the certified applicant is subject to 3449 decertification if the certified applicant fails to comply with 3450 this section or the agreement. 3451 4.âStates that the department may recover state incentive 3452 funds if the certified applicant is decertified. 3453 5.âSpecifies the information that the certified applicant 3454 must report to the department. 3455 6.âIncludes any provision deemed prudent by the department. 3456 (3)âUSE OF FUNDS.â 3457 (a)âA certified applicant may use funds provided under s. 3458 212.20(6)(d)7.c. s. 212.20(6)(d)6.c. only to: 3459 1.âServe the public purpose of constructing or renovating a 3460 facility for a spring training franchise. 3461 2.âPay or pledge for the payment of debt service on, or to 3462 fund debt service reserve funds, arbitrage rebate obligations, 3463 or other amounts payable with respect thereto, bonds issued for 3464 the construction or renovation of such facility, or for the 3465 reimbursement of such costs or the refinancing of bonds issued 3466 for such purposes. 3467 (c)âThe Department of Revenue may not distribute funds 3468 under s. 212.20(6)(d)7.c. s. 212.20(6)(d)6.c. until July 1, 3469 2016. Further, the Department of Revenue may not distribute 3470 funds to an applicant certified on or after July 1, 2013, until 3471 it receives notice from the department that: 3472 1.âThe certified applicant has encumbered funds under 3473 either subparagraph (a)1. or subparagraph (a)2.; and 3474 2.âIf applicable, any existing agreement with a spring 3475 training franchise for the use of a facility has expired. 3476 (d)1.âAll certified applicants shall place unexpended state 3477 funds received pursuant to s. 212.20(6)(d)7.c. s. 3478 212.20(6)(d)6.c. in a trust fund or separate account for use 3479 only as authorized in this section. 3480 2.âA certified applicant may request that the department 3481 notify the Department of Revenue to suspend further 3482 distributions of state funds made available under s. 3483 212.20(6)(d)7.c. s. 212.20(6)(d)6.c. for 12 months after 3484 expiration of an existing agreement with a spring training 3485 franchise to provide the certified applicant with an opportunity 3486 to enter into a new agreement with a spring training franchise, 3487 at which time the distributions shall resume. 3488 3.âThe expenditure of state funds distributed to an 3489 applicant certified after July 1, 2013, must begin within 48 3490 months after the initial receipt of the state funds. In 3491 addition, the construction or renovation of a spring training 3492 facility must be completed within 24 months after the projectâs 3493 commencement. 3494 Section 68.âSubsection (1) of section 443.191, Florida 3495 Statutes, is amended to read: 3496 443.191âUnemployment Compensation Trust Fund; establishment 3497 and control.â 3498 (1)âThere is established, as a separate trust fund apart 3499 from all other public funds of this state, an Unemployment 3500 Compensation Trust Fund, which shall be administered by the 3501 Department of Commerce exclusively for the purposes of this 3502 chapter. The fund must consist of: 3503 (a)âAll contributions and reimbursements collected under 3504 this chapter; 3505 (b)âInterest earned on any moneys in the fund; 3506 (c)âAny property or securities acquired through the use of 3507 moneys belonging to the fund; 3508 (d)âAll earnings of these properties or securities; 3509 (e)âAll money credited to this stateâs account in the 3510 federal Unemployment Compensation Trust Fund under 42 U.S.C. s. 3511 1103; 3512 (f)âAll money collected for penalties imposed pursuant to 3513 s. 443.151(6)(a); 3514 (g)âAdvances on the amount in the federal Unemployment 3515 Compensation Trust Fund credited to the state under 42 U.S.C. s. 3516 1321, as requested by the Governor or the Governorâs designee; 3517 and 3518 (h)âAll money deposited in this account as a distribution 3519 pursuant to s. 212.20(6)(d)7.e. s. 212.20(6)(d)6.e. 3520 3521 Except as otherwise provided in s. 443.1313(4), all moneys in 3522 the fund must be mingled and undivided. 3523 Section 69.âSection 571.26, Florida Statutes, is amended to 3524 read: 3525 571.26âFlorida Agricultural Promotional Campaign Trust 3526 Fund.âThere is hereby created the Florida Agricultural 3527 Promotional Campaign Trust Fund within the Department of 3528 Agriculture and Consumer Services to receive all moneys related 3529 to the Florida Agricultural Promotional Campaign. Moneys 3530 deposited in the trust fund shall be appropriated for the sole 3531 purpose of implementing the Florida Agricultural Promotional 3532 Campaign, except for money deposited in the trust fund pursuant 3533 to s. 212.20(6)(d)7.e. s. 212.20(6)(d)6.e., which shall be held 3534 separately and used solely for the purposes identified in s. 3535 571.265. 3536 Section 70.âSubsection (2) of section 571.265, Florida 3537 Statutes, is amended to read: 3538 571.265âPromotion of Florida thoroughbred breeding and of 3539 thoroughbred racing at Florida thoroughbred tracks; distribution 3540 of funds.â 3541 (2)âFunds deposited into the Florida Agricultural 3542 Promotional Campaign Trust Fund pursuant to s. 212.20(6)(d)7.e. 3543 s. 212.20(6)(d)6.e. shall be used by the department to encourage 3544 the agricultural activity of breeding thoroughbred racehorses in 3545 this state and to enhance thoroughbred racing conducted at 3546 thoroughbred tracks in this state as provided in this section. 3547 If the funds made available under this section are not fully 3548 used in any one fiscal year, any unused amounts shall be carried 3549 forward in the trust fund into future fiscal years and made 3550 available for distribution as provided in this section. 3551 Section 71.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 3552 made by this act to section 20.60, Florida Statutes, in a 3553 reference thereto, subsection (8) of section 288.9935, Florida 3554 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 3555 288.9935âMicrofinance Guarantee Program.â 3556 (8)âThe department must, in the departmentâs report 3557 required under s. 20.60(10), include an annual report on the 3558 program. The report must, at a minimum, provide: 3559 (a)âA comprehensive description of the program, including 3560 an evaluation of its application and guarantee activities, 3561 recommendations for change, and identification of any other 3562 state programs that overlap with the program; 3563 (b)âAn assessment of the current availability of and access 3564 to credit for entrepreneurs and small businesses in this state; 3565 (c)âA summary of the financial and employment results of 3566 the entrepreneurs and small businesses receiving loan 3567 guarantees, including the number of full-time equivalent jobs 3568 created as a result of the guaranteed loans and the amount of 3569 wages paid to employees in the newly created jobs; 3570 (d)âIndustry data about the borrowers, including the six 3571 digit North American Industry Classification System (NAICS) 3572 code; 3573 (e)âThe name and location of lenders that receive loan 3574 guarantees; 3575 (f)âThe number of loan guarantee applications received; 3576 (g)âThe number, duration, location, and amount of 3577 guarantees made; 3578 (h)âThe number and amount of guaranteed loans outstanding, 3579 if any; 3580 (i)âThe number and amount of guaranteed loans with payments 3581 overdue, if any; 3582 (j)âThe number and amount of guaranteed loans in default, 3583 if any; 3584 (k)âThe repayment history of the guaranteed loans made; and 3585 (l)âAn evaluation of the programâs ability to meet the 3586 financial performance measures and objectives specified in 3587 subsection (3). 3588 Section 72.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 3589 made by this act to section 218.67, Florida Statutes, in a 3590 reference thereto, paragraph (c) of subsection (5) of section 3591 125.0104, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 3592 125.0104âTourist development tax; procedure for levying; 3593 authorized uses; referendum; enforcement.â 3594 (5)âAUTHORIZED USES OF REVENUE.â 3595 (c)âA county located adjacent to the Gulf of America or the 3596 Atlantic Ocean, except a county that receives revenue from taxes 3597 levied pursuant to s. 125.0108, which meets the following 3598 criteria may use up to 10 percent of the tax revenue received 3599 pursuant to this section to reimburse expenses incurred in 3600 providing public safety services, including emergency medical 3601 services as defined in s. 401.107(3), and law enforcement 3602 services, which are needed to address impacts related to 3603 increased tourism and visitors to an area. However, if taxes 3604 collected pursuant to this section are used to reimburse 3605 emergency medical services or public safety services for tourism 3606 or special events, the governing board of a county or 3607 municipality may not use such taxes to supplant the normal 3608 operating expenses of an emergency medical services department, 3609 a fire department, a sheriffâs office, or a police department. 3610 To receive reimbursement, the county must: 3611 1.a.âGenerate a minimum of $10 million in annual proceeds 3612 from any tax, or any combination of taxes, authorized to be 3613 levied pursuant to this section; 3614 b.âHave at least three municipalities; and 3615 c.âHave an estimated population of less than 275,000, 3616 according to the most recent population estimate prepared 3617 pursuant to s. 186.901, excluding the inmate population; or 3618 2.âBe a fiscally constrained county as described in s. 3619 218.67(1). 3620 3621 The board of county commissioners must by majority vote approve 3622 reimbursement made pursuant to this paragraph upon receipt of a 3623 recommendation from the tourist development council. 3624 Section 73.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 3625 made by this act to section 218.67, Florida Statutes, in a 3626 reference thereto, subsection (3) of section 193.624, Florida 3627 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 3628 193.624âAssessment of renewable energy source devices.â 3629 (3)âThis section applies to the installation of a renewable 3630 energy source device installed on or after January 1, 2013, to 3631 new and existing residential real property. This section applies 3632 to a renewable energy source device installed on or after 3633 January 1, 2018, to all other real property, except when 3634 installed as part of a project planned for a location in a 3635 fiscally constrained county, as defined in s. 218.67(1), and for 3636 which an application for a comprehensive plan amendment or 3637 planned unit development zoning has been filed with the county 3638 on or before December 31, 2017. 3639 Section 74.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 3640 made by this act to section 218.67, Florida Statutes, in a 3641 reference thereto, subsection (2) of section 196.182, Florida 3642 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 3643 196.182âExemption of renewable energy source devices.â 3644 (2)âThe exemption provided in this section does not apply 3645 to a renewable energy source device that is installed as part of 3646 a project planned for a location in a fiscally constrained 3647 county, as defined in s. 218.67(1), and for which an application 3648 for a comprehensive plan amendment or planned unit development 3649 zoning has been filed with the county on or before December 31, 3650 2017. 3651 Section 75.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 3652 made by this act to section 218.67, Florida Statutes, in a 3653 reference thereto, subsection (1) of section 218.12, Florida 3654 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 3655 218.12âAppropriations to offset reductions in ad valorem 3656 tax revenue in fiscally constrained counties.â 3657 (1)âBeginning in fiscal year 2008-2009, the Legislature 3658 shall appropriate moneys to offset the reductions in ad valorem 3659 tax revenue experienced by fiscally constrained counties, as 3660 defined in s. 218.67(1), which occur as a direct result of the 3661 implementation of revisions of Art. VII of the State 3662 Constitution approved in the special election held on January 3663 29, 2008. The moneys appropriated for this purpose shall be 3664 distributed in January of each fiscal year among the fiscally 3665 constrained counties based on each countyâs proportion of the 3666 total reduction in ad valorem tax revenue resulting from the 3667 implementation of the revision. 3668 Section 76.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 3669 made by this act to section 218.67, Florida Statutes, in a 3670 reference thereto, subsection (1) of section 218.125, Florida 3671 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 3672 218.125âOffset for tax loss associated with certain 3673 constitutional amendments affecting fiscally constrained 3674 counties.â 3675 (1)âBeginning in the 2010-2011 fiscal year, the Legislature 3676 shall appropriate moneys to offset the reductions in ad valorem 3677 tax revenue experienced by fiscally constrained counties, as 3678 defined in s. 218.67(1), which occur as a direct result of the 3679 implementation of revisions of ss. 3(f) and 4(b), Art. VII of 3680 the State Constitution which were approved in the general 3681 election held in November 2008. The moneys appropriated for this 3682 purpose shall be distributed in January of each fiscal year 3683 among the fiscally constrained counties based on each countyâs 3684 proportion of the total reduction in ad valorem tax revenue 3685 resulting from the implementation of the revisions. 3686 Section 77.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 3687 made by this act to section 218.67, Florida Statutes, in a 3688 reference thereto, subsection (1) of section 218.135, Florida 3689 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 3690 218.135âOffset for tax loss associated with reductions in 3691 value of certain citrus fruit packing and processing equipment.â 3692 (1)âFor the 2018-2019 fiscal year, the Legislature shall 3693 appropriate moneys to offset the reductions in ad valorem tax 3694 revenue experienced by fiscally constrained counties, as defined 3695 in s. 218.67(1), which occur as a direct result of the 3696 implementation of s. 193.4516. The moneys appropriated for this 3697 purpose shall be distributed in January 2019 among the fiscally 3698 constrained counties based on each countyâs proportion of the 3699 total reduction in ad valorem tax revenue resulting from the 3700 implementation of s. 193.4516. 3701 Section 78.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 3702 made by this act to section 218.67, Florida Statutes, in a 3703 reference thereto, subsection (1) of section 218.136, Florida 3704 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 3705 218.136âOffset for ad valorem revenue loss affecting 3706 fiscally constrained counties.â 3707 (1)âBeginning in fiscal year 2025-2026, the Legislature 3708 shall appropriate moneys to offset the reductions in ad valorem 3709 tax revenue experienced by fiscally constrained counties, as 3710 defined in s. 218.67(1), which occur as a direct result of the 3711 implementation of revisions of s. 6(a), Art. VII of the State 3712 Constitution approved in the November 2024 general election. The 3713 moneys appropriated for this purpose shall be distributed in 3714 January of each fiscal year among the fiscally constrained 3715 counties based on each countyâs proportion of the total 3716 reduction in ad valorem tax revenue resulting from the 3717 implementation of the revision of s. 6(a), Art. VII of the State 3718 Constitution. 3719 Section 79.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 3720 made by this act to section 218.67, Florida Statutes, in a 3721 reference thereto, paragraph (cc) of subsection (2) of section 3722 252.35, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 3723 252.35âEmergency management powers; Division of Emergency 3724 Management.â 3725 (2)âThe division is responsible for carrying out the 3726 provisions of ss. 252.31-252.90. In performing its duties, the 3727 division shall: 3728 (cc)âAdminister a revolving loan program for local 3729 government hazard mitigation projects. 3730 Section 80.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 3731 made by this act to section 218.67, Florida Statutes, in a 3732 reference thereto, subsection (4) of section 288.102, Florida 3733 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 3734 288.102âSupply Chain Innovation Grant Program.â 3735 (4)âA minimum of a one-to-one match of nonstate resources, 3736 including local, federal, or private funds, to the state 3737 contribution is required. An award may not be made for a project 3738 that is receiving or using state funding from another state 3739 source or statutory program, including tax credits. The one-to 3740 one match requirement is waived for a public entity located in a 3741 fiscally constrained county as defined in s. 218.67(1). 3742 Section 81.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 3743 made by this act to section 218.67, Florida Statutes, in a 3744 reference thereto, paragraph (h) of subsection (16) of section 3745 403.064, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 3746 403.064âReuse of reclaimed water.â 3747 (16)âBy November 1, 2021, domestic wastewater utilities 3748 that dispose of effluent, reclaimed water, or reuse water by 3749 surface water discharge shall submit to the department for 3750 review and approval a plan for eliminating nonbeneficial surface 3751 water discharge by January 1, 2032, subject to the requirements 3752 of this section. The plan must include the average gallons per 3753 day of effluent, reclaimed water, or reuse water that will no 3754 longer be discharged into surface waters and the date of such 3755 elimination, the average gallons per day of surface water 3756 discharge which will continue in accordance with the 3757 alternatives provided for in subparagraphs (a)2. and 3., and the 3758 level of treatment that the effluent, reclaimed water, or reuse 3759 water will receive before being discharged into a surface water 3760 by each alternative. 3761 (h)âThis subsection does not apply to any of the following: 3762 1.âA domestic wastewater treatment facility that is located 3763 in a fiscally constrained county as described in s. 218.67(1). 3764 2.âA domestic wastewater treatment facility that is located 3765 in a municipality that is entirely within a rural area of 3766 opportunity as designated pursuant to s. 288.0656. 3767 3.âA domestic wastewater treatment facility that is located 3768 in a municipality that has less than $10 million in total 3769 revenue, as determined by the municipalityâs most recent annual 3770 financial report submitted to the Department of Financial 3771 Services in accordance with s. 218.32. 3772 4.âA domestic wastewater treatment facility that is 3773 operated by an operator of a mobile home park as defined in s. 3774 723.003 and has a permitted capacity of less than 300,000 3775 gallons per day. 3776 Section 82.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 3777 made by this act to section 218.67, Florida Statutes, in 3778 references thereto, subsections (2) and (3) of section 589.08, 3779 Florida Statutes, are reenacted to read: 3780 589.08âLand acquisition restrictions.â 3781 (2)âThe Florida Forest Service may receive, hold the 3782 custody of, and exercise the control of any lands, and set aside 3783 into a separate, distinct and inviolable fund, any proceeds 3784 derived from the sales of the products of such lands, the use 3785 thereof in any manner, or the sale of such lands save the 25 3786 percent of the proceeds to be paid into the State School Fund as 3787 provided by law. The Florida Forest Service may use and apply 3788 such funds for the acquisition, use, custody, management, 3789 development, or improvement of any lands vested in or subject to 3790 the control of the Florida Forest Service. After full payment 3791 has been made for the purchase of a state forest to the Federal 3792 Government or other grantor, 15 percent of the gross receipts 3793 from a state forest shall be paid to the fiscally constrained 3794 county or counties, as described in s. 218.67(1), in which it is 3795 located in proportion to the acreage located in each county for 3796 use by the county or counties for school purposes. 3797 (3)âThe Florida Forest Service shall pay 15 percent of the 3798 gross receipts from the Goethe State Forest to each fiscally 3799 constrained county, as described in s. 218.67(1), in which a 3800 portion of the respective forest is located in proportion to the 3801 forest acreage located in such county. The funds must be equally 3802 divided between the board of county commissioners and the school 3803 board of each fiscally constrained county. 3804 Section 83.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 3805 made by this act to section 218.67, Florida Statutes, in a 3806 reference thereto, paragraph (f) of subsection (1) of section 3807 1011.62, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 3808 1011.62âFunds for operation of schools.âIf the annual 3809 allocation from the Florida Education Finance Program to each 3810 district for operation of schools is not determined in the 3811 annual appropriations act or the substantive bill implementing 3812 the annual appropriations act, it shall be determined as 3813 follows: 3814 (1)âCOMPUTATION OF THE BASE FLORIDA EDUCATION FINANCE 3815 PROGRAM.âThe following procedure shall be followed in 3816 determining the base Florida Education Finance Program funds for 3817 each district: 3818 (f)âSmall district factor.âAn additional value per full 3819 time equivalent student membership is provided to each school 3820 district with a full-time equivalent student membership of fewer 3821 than 20,000 full-time equivalent students which is in a fiscally 3822 constrained county as described in s. 218.67(1). The amount of 3823 the additional value shall be specified in the General 3824 Appropriations Act. 3825 Section 84.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendments 3826 made by this act to sections 218.67 and 339.2818, Florida 3827 Statutes, in references thereto, paragraph (c) of subsection (6) 3828 of section 403.0741, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 3829 403.0741âGrease waste removal and disposal.â 3830 (6)âREGULATION BY LOCAL GOVERNMENTS.â 3831 (c)âFiscally constrained counties as described in s. 3832 218.67(1) and small counties as defined in s. 339.2818(2) may 3833 opt out of the requirements of this section. 3834 Section 85.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 3835 made by this act to section 288.0656, Florida Statutes, in a 3836 reference thereto, paragraph (e) of subsection (7) of section 3837 163.3177, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 3838 163.3177âRequired and optional elements of comprehensive 3839 plan; studies and surveys.â 3840 (7) 3841 (e)âThis subsection does not confer the status of rural 3842 area of opportunity, or any of the rights or benefits derived 3843 from such status, on any land area not otherwise designated as 3844 such pursuant to s. 288.0656(7). 3845 Section 86.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 3846 made by this act to section 288.9961, Florida Statutes, in a 3847 reference thereto, paragraph (a) of subsection (7) of section 3848 288.9962, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 3849 288.9962âBroadband Opportunity Program.â 3850 (7)(a)âIn evaluating grant applications and awarding 3851 grants, the office must give priority to applications that: 3852 1.âOffer broadband Internet service to important community 3853 institutions, including, but not limited to, libraries, 3854 educational institutions, public safety facilities, and health 3855 care facilities; 3856 2.âFacilitate the use of telemedicine and electronic health 3857 records; 3858 3.âServe economically distressed areas of this state, as 3859 measured by indices of unemployment, poverty, or population loss 3860 that are significantly greater than the statewide average; 3861 4.âProvide for scalability to transmission speeds of at 3862 least 100 megabits per second download and 10 megabits per 3863 second upload; 3864 5.âInclude a component to actively promote the adoption of 3865 the newly available broadband Internet service in the community; 3866 6.âProvide evidence of strong support for the project from 3867 citizens, government, businesses, and institutions in the 3868 community; 3869 7.âProvide access to broadband Internet service to the 3870 greatest number of unserved households and businesses; 3871 8.âLeverage greater amounts of funding for a project from 3872 private sources; or 3873 9.âDemonstrate consistency with the strategic plan adopted 3874 under s. 288.9961. 3875 Section 87.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 3876 made by this act to section 319.32, Florida Statutes, in a 3877 reference thereto, subsection (1) of section 215.211, Florida 3878 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 3879 215.211âService charge; elimination or reduction for 3880 specified proceeds.â 3881 (1)âNotwithstanding the provisions of s. 215.20(1) and 3882 former s. 215.20(3), the service charge provided in s. 215.20(1) 3883 and former s. 215.20(3), which is deducted from the proceeds of 3884 the taxes distributed under ss. 206.606(1), 207.026, 3885 212.0501(6), and 319.32(5), shall be eliminated beginning July 3886 1, 2000. 3887 Section 88.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 3888 made by this act to section 339.68, Florida Statutes, in 3889 references thereto, subsections (5) and (6) of section 339.66, 3890 Florida Statutes, are reenacted to read: 3891 339.66âUpgrade of arterial highways with controlled access 3892 facilities.â 3893 (5)âAny existing applicable requirements relating to 3894 department projects shall apply to projects undertaken by the 3895 department pursuant to this section. The department shall take 3896 into consideration the guidance and recommendations of any 3897 previous studies or reports relevant to the projects authorized 3898 by this section and ss. 339.67 and 339.68, including, but not 3899 limited to, the task force reports prepared pursuant to chapter 3900 2019-43, Laws of Florida. 3901 (6)âAny existing applicable requirements relating to 3902 turnpike projects apply to projects undertaken by the Turnpike 3903 Enterprise pursuant to this section. The Turnpike Enterprise 3904 shall take into consideration the guidance and recommendations 3905 of any previous studies or reports relevant to the projects 3906 authorized by this section and ss. 339.67 and 339.68, including, 3907 but not limited to, the task force reports prepared pursuant to 3908 chapter 2019-43, Laws of Florida, and with respect to any 3909 extension of the Florida Turnpike from its northerly terminus in 3910 Wildwood. 3911 Section 89.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 3912 made by this act to section 420.9073, Florida Statutes, in 3913 references thereto, subsections (4) and (6) of section 420.9072, 3914 Florida Statutes, are reenacted to read: 3915 420.9072âState Housing Initiatives Partnership Program.âThe 3916 State Housing Initiatives Partnership Program is created for the 3917 purpose of providing funds to counties and eligible 3918 municipalities as an incentive for the creation of local housing 3919 partnerships, to expand production of and preserve affordable 3920 housing, to further the housing element of the local government 3921 comprehensive plan specific to affordable housing, and to 3922 increase housing-related employment. 3923 (4)âMoneys in the Local Government Housing Trust Fund shall 3924 be distributed by the corporation to each approved county and 3925 eligible municipality within the county as provided in s. 3926 420.9073. Distributions shall be allocated to the participating 3927 county and to each eligible municipality within the county 3928 according to an interlocal agreement between the county 3929 governing authority and the governing body of the eligible 3930 municipality or, if there is no interlocal agreement, according 3931 to population. The portion for each eligible municipality is 3932 computed by multiplying the total moneys earmarked for a county 3933 by a fraction, the numerator of which is the population of the 3934 eligible municipality and the denominator of which is the total 3935 population of the county. The remaining revenues shall be 3936 distributed to the governing body of the county. 3937 (6)âThe moneys that otherwise would be distributed pursuant 3938 to s. 420.9073 to a local government that does not meet the 3939 programâs requirements for receipts of such distributions shall 3940 remain in the Local Government Housing Trust Fund to be 3941 administered by the corporation. 3942 Section 90.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 3943 made by this act to section 420.9073, Florida Statutes, in a 3944 reference thereto, paragraph (b) of subsection (7) of section 3945 420.9076, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 3946 420.9076âAdoption of affordable housing incentive 3947 strategies; committees.â 3948 (7)âThe governing board of the county or the eligible 3949 municipality shall notify the corporation by certified mail of 3950 its adoption of an amendment of its local housing assistance 3951 plan to incorporate local housing incentive strategies. The 3952 notice must include a copy of the approved amended plan. 3953 (b)âIf a county fails to timely adopt an amended local 3954 housing assistance plan to incorporate local housing incentive 3955 strategies but an eligible municipality receiving a local 3956 housing distribution pursuant to an interlocal agreement within 3957 the county does timely adopt an amended local housing assistance 3958 plan to incorporate local housing incentive strategies, the 3959 corporation, after issuance of a notice of termination, shall 3960 thereafter distribute directly to the participating eligible 3961 municipality its share calculated in the manner provided in s. 3962 420.9073. 3963 Section 91.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 3964 made by this act to section 420.9073, Florida Statutes, in a 3965 reference thereto, subsection (2) of section 420.9079, Florida 3966 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 3967 420.9079âLocal Government Housing Trust Fund.â 3968 (2)âThe corporation shall administer the fund exclusively 3969 for the purpose of implementing the programs described in ss. 3970 420.907-420.9076 and this section. With the exception of 3971 monitoring the activities of counties and eligible 3972 municipalities to determine local compliance with program 3973 requirements, the corporation shall not receive appropriations 3974 from the fund for administrative or personnel costs. For the 3975 purpose of implementing the compliance monitoring provisions of 3976 s. 420.9075(9), the corporation may request a maximum of one 3977 quarter of 1 percent of the annual appropriation per state 3978 fiscal year. When such funding is appropriated, the corporation 3979 shall deduct the amount appropriated prior to calculating the 3980 local housing distribution pursuant to ss. 420.9072 and 3981 420.9073. 3982 Section 92.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.